[Scene  Central Perk, Phoebe is recapping last season, and as she talks we see a
montague of scenes from Ross and Rachel.]
Phoebe  Ok, so this is pretty much what's happened so far. Ross was in love with
Rachel since, you know, forever, but every time he tried to tell her, something kind of
got in the way, like cats, and Italian guys. Finally Chandler was like "forget about
her" but when Ross was in China on his dig, Chandler let it slip that Ross was in
love with Rachel. She was like, "Oh my god." So she went to the airport to meet
him when he came back, but what she didn't know was, that Ross was getting off the plane
with another woman. Uh-Oh! So, that's pretty much everything you need to know. But, enough
about us. So, how've you been?
Rachel  Oh my god. Oh my god. (She decides to make a break for it.) Excuse me.
Move! Move! Emergency! Excuse me! (She tries climbing over a bench and falls down.)
Ross  (seeing her) Rach!
Rachel  Oh, there you are! Hi! Oh, so, so, how was China, you? (Hits him with
the flowers.)
Ross  It was, it was great. Oh, what happened?
Rachel  What?
Ross  You're bleeding.
Rachel  I am? Oh, look at that, yes I am. Enough about me, enough about me, Mr.
Back from the Orient. Come on. I wanna hear everything! Everything. (Looks at Julie)
Ross  Well, where do I start? This is Julie. Julie, this is Rachel.
Rachel  These are, these aren't for you. (to Julie) These are for you. (Loudly,
thinking she can't speak English.) Welcome to our country.
Julie  (Loudly, proving she can speak English.) Thank you. I'm from New York.
Rachel  Ok, well, not a problem. We'll just use them to stop the bleeding. Ok.
Baggage claim? Ok.
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's, the gang is waiting for Rachel to return from the airport
with Ross.]
Chandler   No way!
Monica  I'm telling you, she went to the airport, and she's gonna go for it with
Ross!
Phoebe  Oh my god. This is huge. This is bigger than huge. This is like, all
right, what's bigger than huge?
Joey  Um, this?
Phoebe  Yes.
Monica  Guys, you got your hair cut.
Chandler  Yes, yes, we did, thanks to Vidal Buffay.
Phoebe  'Cause, you know, (in that voice) if you don't look good, we don't look
good. I love that voice.
Rachel  (entering, out of breath) Airport, airport. Ross, not alone, Julie, arm
around her. Cramp, cramp.
Chandler  Ok, I think she's trying to tell us something. Quick, get the verbs.
Rachel  (to Chandler) You, you, you said he liked me. (Ross and Julie enter)
You, you slowpokes!
Ross  That's all right, Rach, we got the bags. Hi, hello. Julie, this is my
sister Monica. This is Chandler.  Phoebe.  Joey, what up?
Joey  What up?!
Ross  Everyone, this is Julie.
Rachel  (out of breath) Julie.
All  Ohh. (Happily) Hi!
Julie  Hi, but I'm not here, you haven't met me. I'll make a much better first
impression tomorrow when I don't have 20 hours of cab and plane on me.
Ross  And bus.
Julie  Oh my god.
Ross   The screaming guy?
Julie   And the spitting?
Ross  You gotta hear this story.
Julie  We're on this bus, that's easily 200 years old...
Ross  200 at least.
Julie   ...and this guy...
Rachel  And the chicken pooped in her lap. Oh, I'm so sorry. I just gave away
the ending, didn't I? Oh! It's just, I just heard this story in the cab, and it is all I
can think about.
Monica  This is amazing. I mean, how, how did this happen?
Julie  Well, Ross and I were in grad school together.
Ross  But we haven't seen each other since then. Well I land in China, guess
who's in charge of the dig.
Rachel  Julie! Julie, isn't that great? I mean, isn't that just
kick-you-in-the-crotch, spit-on-your-neck fantastic?
Monica  (to Julie) It's an expression.
Ross  Well, we just wanted to say a quick hi, and then we're gonna go see the
baby.
Julie  And then we've gotta get some sleep.
Chandler  Well, listen, don't tell us what's gonna happen though, 'cause I like
to be surprised.
Rachel  Bye. (She closes the door and everyone tries to sympathize with her.)
[Scene  Central Perk, Ross and Chandler enter.]
Ross  Hey, Rach, can I get some coffee?
Rachel  Yeah, sure.
Ross  Thank you.
Chandler  Hey, Rach, can I get...
Rachel  Did you talk to him?
Chandler  Not yet.
Rachel  Then, no.
Chandler  So what the hell happened to you in China? I mean, when last we left
you, you were totally in love with, you know.
Ross  I know, I know I was, but there was always this little voice inside that
kept saying it's never gonna happen, move on. You know whose voice that was?
Chandler  God?
Ross  It was you, pal.
Chandler  Well, maybe it was God, doing me.
Ross  Look, you were right. She looks at me and sees a friend, that's all. But
then I met Julie, and I don't know, we're havin' a great time. And I have to say, I never
would've gone for it with her if it hadn't been for you.
Chandler  Well, you owe me one, big guy.
Rachel  (To Ross) Here's your lemonade.
Ross  I didn't order lemonade.
Rachel  Oh. Well then, you better go take that back because they're gonna charge
you for that.
Ross  But...
Rachel  Go-go-go-go, come on! (Ross goes over to the counte) (to Chandler) So
uh, what did you find out?
Chandler  He said...he said, he said that they're having a great time. I'm
sorry. But, the silver lining, if you wanna see it, is that he made the decision all by
himself!  Without any outside help whatsoever.
Rachel  How is that the silver lining?
Chandler  You have to really wanna see it.
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's, Ross and the gang is watching Sumo wrestling on TV.]
Ross  Ironically, these are the guys who were picked last in gym.
Monica  Pheebes, you know what I'm thinking?
Phoebe  Oh, ok. How, it's been so long since you've had sex, you're wondering if
they've changed it?
Monica  No, although now that's what I'm thinking.
Phoebe  All right, so what were you thinking?
Monica  Well, I was thinking, that you gave the guys such great haircuts, I
thought, maybe you'd like to do mine?
Phoebe  Ohh! No.
Monica  Why not?
Phoebe  Because, I'm just, I'm incredibly anal and an unbelievable control
freak.
Monica  No you're not.
Phoebe  I know I'm not, but you are, and I was trying to spare your feelings.
Joey  (answering the phone) Hello? Oh, hi. Yeah, hold on a second. Ross, it's
Julie, for you. (Throws him the phone.)
Ross  (on phone) Hello? Hi.
Chandler  (entering) Hi. Anybody know a good tailor?
Joey  Needs some clothes altered?
Chandler  No, no, I'm just looking for a man to draw on me with chalk.
Joey  Why don't you go see Frankie? My family's been goin' to him forever. He
did my first suit when I was 15. No wait, 16. No, 'scuse me, 15. (still confused) All
right, when was 1990?
Chandler  Okay.  You have to stop the Q-tip when there's resistance!
Ross  (on phone) Ok, ok, sweetheart, I'll see you later. Ok, bye. What? (Sits
down next to Rachel) Oh, that is so sweet. No, no, ok, you hang up. Ok, ok, one, two,
three. (Doesn't hang up and motions for Rachel to be quiet) Well you didn't hang up
either.
Rachel  She didn't hang up either!
Ross  Ok, no, no, you hang up. You, you, y...
Rachel  (taking the phone and hanging it up) Sorry, I thought you were talking
to me.
Ross  Rachel! I'll just call her back.
Rachel  Okay!
Ross  (calls Julie back) Hi?  Sorry, we got disconnected... (Walks away.)
Rachel  (to Monica) Ok, ok, ok. How did this happen to me? How did this happen
to me? A week ago, two weeks ago, I was fine. Ross was just Ross, just this guy. Now he's
Rrrooossss, oh, this really great guy that I can't have.
Monica  Sweetie, I wanted you to have him too.
Rachel  I know you did. I'm just gonna deal with it, I'm just gonna deal with
it. (Ross comes by, smoching with Julie on the phone.) I gotta get out of here. (Exits)
Chandler  Ok, I don't care what you guys say, something's bothering her.
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's, the next morning.]
Joey  (to Chandler) You know, I think I was sixteen.
Monica  (to Phoebe) Please, just a little bit off the back.
Phoebe  I'm still on "no."
Rachel  (poking her head in from her bedroom) Uh, morning. Do you guys think you
could close your eyes for just a sec?
Joey  No-no-no-no-no, (grabs his pants) I'm not fallin' for that again.
Phoebe  What's goin' on?
Rachel  Well, I sorta did a stupid thing last night.
Chandler  What stupid thing did you do?
Paulo  (entering from Rachel's room) Bon giorno tutti!
Phoebe  Ewww! (Gets up and walks away.)
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's, continued from earlier.]
Rachel  Ok, Paulo, why don't you just go get dressed, and then you be on your
way, ok, bye-bye. (Paulo goes into his room.)
Monica  Rachel, how did this happen?
Rachel  I don't know, I just kinda ran into him last night.
Phoebe  Where?
Rachel  At his apartment. Is this juice?
Joey  Whoa, whoa. And the fact that you dumped him because he hit on Phoebe?
Rachel  Oh God, I know I'm a pathetic loser.
Monica  Honey, you're not pathetic, you're sad.
Chandler  People do stupid things when they're upset.
Monica  My god, if I had a nickel for every guy I wish I hadn't...(Everyone
looks at her), but this is about your horrible mistake.
All  Hi!
Ross  Hi. Sorry we're late but we were—well, there was touching.
Paulo  (entering) Hey, hey Ross.
Ross  Hey, Paulo. What are you doing here?
Paulo  I do Raquel.
Ross  (to Rachel) So, uh, he's back.
Rachel  Yeah, he's back. Is that a problem?
Ross  No, not a problem.
Rachel  Good! I'm glad it's not a problem.
Phoebe  (to Paulo) Ok, you're gonna have to not touch my ass.
Chandler  Well, in spite of the yummy bagels and palpable tension, I've got
pants that need to be altered.
Joey  Hey, Chandler, when you see Frankie, tell him Joey Tribbiani says hello.
He'll know what it means.
Chandler  Are you sure he's gonna be able to crack that code?
Monica  (to Phoebe) You know it's funny, the last time Paulo was here, my hair
was so much shorter and cuter.
Phoebe  All right. Ok, but, but!  You have to promise that you will not be
all like control-y and bossy and Monica about it.
Monica  I promise.
Phoebe  All right. (Talking to Monica's hair.) Now some of you are gonna get
cut, and some of you aren't. But I promise none of you are gonna feel a thing.
[Scene  Monica's bedroom, Phoebe is finishing with her haircut and Monica is whincing.]
Phoebe  All right, that's it, I quit.
Monica  What? I didn't say anything.
Phoebe  Yeah, but this (makes Monica's face) isn't the face of a person who
trusts a person. Ok, this (makes Monica's face) is the face of a person who, you know,
doesn't trust a person.
Monica  I'm sorry. I'm sorry, Phoebe. It's just a little shorter than what we
had discussed.
Phoebe  Would you relax? I know what I am doing. This is how he wears it.
Monica  How who wears it?
Phoebe  Demi Moore.
Monica  Demi Moore is not a he.
Phoebe  Well, he was a he in Arthur, and in Ten.
Monica  That's Dudley Moore. I said I wanted it like Demi Moore.
Phoebe  Oh.  Oh!
Monica  Oh my God!
Phoebe  Oh my God!
Monica  Oh my God!
Phoebe  Oh my God! I'm sorry, I'm sorry. Which one's Demi Moore?
Monica  She's the actress that was in Disclosure, Indecent
Proposal, Ghost!
Phoebe  Oh, she's got gorgeous hair.
Monica  I know!
[Scene  Frank's tailor shop, Chandler is getting his pants measured.]
Frankie  How long do you want the cuffs?
Chandler  At least as long as I have the pants.
Frankie  I just got that. Ok, now we'll do your inseam.
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's, Monica is recovering from her haircut, Phoebe is playing
her doctor and is coming in from the bedroom.]
Rachel  How is she?
Phoebe  It's too soon to tell. She's resting, which is a good sign.
Ross  How's the hair?
Phoebe  I'm not gonna lie to you, Ross, it doesn't look good. I put a clip on
one side, which seems to have stopped the curling.
Joey  Can we see her?
Phoebe  Your hair looks too good, I think it would upset her. Ross, why don't
you come on in.
Ross   Yeah. (Gets up, but then pauses when he realizes what that
meant.)
Joey  How're you doing?
Rachel  I'm okay.
Joey  Ooh, that bad, huh?
Rachel  What?
Joey  Look, I can sense when women are depressed and vulnerable. It's
one of my gifts.
Rachel  When I saw him get off that plane with her, I really thought I hit rock
bottom. But today, it's like there's rock bottom, 50 feet of crap, then me.
Joey  You gotta tell Ross how you feel.
Rachel  Come on. How can I just tell him? What about Julie?
Joey  What about her? They've only been going out for two weeks. Ross has been
in love with you for like 10 years.
Rachel  I don't know, I don't know.
Joey  Look, Rach, Rach! I've been with my share of women. In fact, I've been
with like a lot of people's share of women. The point is, I've never felt about anyone the
way Ross felt about you.
Chandler  (entering, angry) Yo, paisan! Can I talk to you for a sec? (Pause)
Your tailor is a very bad man!
Joey  Frankie? What're you talking about?
Ross  (entering from the bedroom) Hey, what's goin' on? (Pats Chandler on the
shoulder which causes him to jump.)
Chandler  Joey's tailor...took advantage of me.
Ross  What?
Joey  No way. I've been going to the guy for 12 years.
Chandler  Oh come on! He said he was going to do my inseam, and he ran his hand
up my leg, and then, there was definite...
Ross  What?
Chandler  Cupping.
Joey  That's how they do pants! First they go up one side, they move it over,
then they go up the other side, they move it back, and then they do the rear. (Chandler
and Ross stare at him) What? Ross, Ross, would you tell him? Isn't that how they measure
pants?
Ross  Yes, yes it is. In prison! Whatsa matter with you?
Joey  What? That's not? (Realizes) Oh my God.
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's, later that day.  Monica is now out and about.]
Monica  Even Mary Tyler Moore would've been better.
Ross  I like it. I do, I think it's a Ten. (Chandler laughs.)
Monica  Thank you. My hair is very amused.
Chandler  Come on, Monica, things could be worse. You could get caught between
the moon and New York City. I know it's crazy, but it's true.
Phoebe  (to Chandler and Ross) Thank you.
Ross  Well, I gotta go. Bye. Bye, Rach.
Rachel  (sticking her head in from the balcony) Wait, are you leaving?
Ross  Yeah, that's kinda what I meant by "bye!"
Rachel  Well, can I talk to you for a sec?
Ross  Okay. (goes out onto the balcony)
Joey  Hey, when the doctor does that hernia test...
Chandler  That's ok.
Ross  What's goin' on?
Rachel  Well, first of all, Paulo and I are not back together. It was just a
stupid thing I did, and if I could go back in time and do it again, well, I wouldn't. Um,
second of all (Ross is laughing), what?
Ross  Ok. Well, before I say anything, I just need to know, is this one of those
things where you break up with a guy, and then I tell you what I think, and then the next
day you get back together with the guy, and I look like a complete idiot?
Rachel  No. No-no-no-no.
Ross  Well, then, I think, I think the guy is scum. I hate him. I mean I
actually—I-I physically hate him. I always have. You are way too good to be with a
guy like that.
Rachel  Really?
Ross  You deserve to be with someone who appreciates you, and who gets
how funny and sweet and amazing, and adorable, and sexy you are, you know? Someone who
wakes up every morning thinking "Oh my god, I'm with Rachel". You know, someone
who makes you feel good, the way I am with Julie. (Rachel has moved closer, but hearing
that she starts to back up.) Was there a second of all?
Rachel  No, I think that was the whole all.
Ross  Okay.  Okay. (They hug.) Okay.
Joey  I swear to god, Dad. That's not how they measure pants.
[Scene  Central Perk, Julie is wanting to get her hair cut from Phoebe.]
Julie  I was thinking of doing it a little shorter, you know, like Andie
McDowell's new haircut?
Phoebe  Oh yeah!  Oh, I can do that.
Julie  Really?
Phoebe  You wanna do it right now?
Julie  Great! (Julie leaves)
Phoebe  (to Rachel) Ok, I just wanna be really sure this time. Andie McDowell's
the girl from Four Weddings and a Funeral, right?
Rachel  No. No no no no no. That's Rodney McDowell. Andie McDowell is the guy
from Planet of the Apes.
Phoebe  Oh, yeah. Ok, thank you.
Rachel  You're welcome.
Written by  Adam Chase & Ira Ungerleider
Transcribed by Mindy Mattingly Phillips
With Minor Adjustments by
Monica  (entering from her bedroom carrying a present) Ok, these were
unbelievably expensive, and I know he's gonna grow out of them in like, 20 minutes, but I
couldn't resist. (There a little pair of Nike shoes.)
Phoebe  Oh, look at these! Hey, Ben. Just do it. (Ben starts to cry) Oh my God,
oh, ok, was that too much pressure for him?
Susan  Oh, is he hungry already?
Carol  I guess so. (Carol starts to breast feed Ben.)
Chandler  You know, it's... (sees the feeding taking place next to him)
something funny about sneakers. I'll be right back. (Goes into the kitchen)
Joey  (joins him) I gotta get one, too.
Ross  (following them into the kitchen) What are you guys doing?
Chandler  We're just hanging out by the spoons. Ladle?
Ross  Look, would you guys grow up? That is the most natural beautiful thing in
the world.
Joey  Yeah, we know, but there's a baby suckin' on it.
Ross  This is my son having lunch, ok? It's gonna happen a lot, so you'd better
get used to it. Now if you have any problem with it, if you're uncomfortable, just ask
questions. Carol's fine with it, now come on.
Ross  Carol?
Chandler  Carol? I was just wondering if Joey could ask you a question about
breast-feeding?
Carol  Sure.
Joey  Uh, does it hurt?
Carol  It did at first, but not anymore.
Joey  Chandler?
Chandler  So, uh, how often can you do it?
Carol  As much as he needs.
Joey  Ok, I got one, I got one. Uh, if he blows into one, does the other one get
bigger?
[Scene  Central Perk, the gang is all there.]
Julie  Rachel, do you have any muffins left?
Rachel  Yeah, I forget which ones.
Julie  Oh, you're busy, that's ok, I'll get it. Anybody else want one?
All  No thanks.
Julie  (To Rachel) Oh, you're losin' your apron here, let me get it. There you
go. (Ties it back up for her)
Rachel  (to Julie) Thank you. (under her breath to Chandler) What a bitch.
Julie  Oh, listen you guys. I have this friend at Bloomingdale's who's
quitting tomorrow and he wants to abuse his discount. So, anyone want to come with me and
take advantage of it?
Phoebe  I can't, I have to take my grandmother to the vet.
Monica  Ok, um, I'll go with you.
Julie  Great.
Ross  (enters) Hi, honey.
Chandler  Hey, sweetums.
Ross  Hello to the rest.
All   Hi!
Joey  Monica what're you doin'? You can't go shopping with her? What about
Rachel?
Monica  It's gonna be a problem, isn't it?
Chandler  Come on, you're going to Bloomingdale's with Julie? That's
like cheating on Rachel in her house of worship.
Monica  But I'm...
Phoebe  Monica, she will kill you. She will kill you like a dog in the street.
Ross  (to Monica) So, uh, Jules tells me you guys are going shopping tomorrow?
Monica  Yeah, uh, it's actually not that big a deal.
Ross  It's a big deal to me. This is great, Monica. I really appreciate this.
Monica  You're welcome.
Phoebe  Woof, woof.
[Scene  A Department Store, Joey is selling men's cologne.]
Joey  (A guy walks by) Bijan for men? (Another guy walks by) Bijan for men?
(Another guy walks by) Bijan for men? (An attractive woman walks by.) Hey
Annabelle.
Annabelle  Hey, Joey. So did you hear about the new guy?
Joey  Who?
Annabelle  Nobody knows his name. Me and the girls just call him the Hombre man.
Hombre Man  (to a customer) Hombre? (The guy says yes, and gets his
sample.)
Joey  What's he doin' in my section?
Annabelle  I guess he doesn't know.
Joey  Well, he's gonna. I'll see you a little later, ok? (To the Hombre Man)
Hey, how ya doin'?
Hombre Man  Mornin'.
Joey  Listen, I know you're new, but it's kinda understood that everything from
Young Men's to the escalator is my territory.
Hombre Man  Your territory, huh?
Joey  Yeah. Bijan for men?
Guy  No thanks.
Hombre Man  Hombre?
Guy  Yeah. All right. (They guy gets his sample and leaves.)
Hombre Man  (To Joey) You were saying?
[Scene  Central Perk, Phoebe is there as Monica enters.]
Monica  Phoebe, listen. You were with me, and we were shopping all day.
Phoebe  What?
Monica  We were shopping, and we had lunch.
Phoebe  Oh, all right. What did I have?
Monica  You had a salad.
Phoebe  Oh, no wonder I don't feel full.
Rachel  (entering) Hey, guys, what's up.
Phoebe  I went shopping with Monica all day, and I had a salad.
Rachel  Good, Pheebs. What'd you buy?
Phoebe  Um, we went shopping for um, for, fur.
Rachel  You went shopping for fur?
Phoebe  Yes, and then I realized I'm against that, and uh, so then we bought
some, (sees Monica pointing at her chest) uh, boobs.
Rachel  You bought boobs?
Phoebe  (Monica is yanking on her bra strap) Bras! We bought bras! We bought
bras.
[Scene  The Department Store, Joey is trying to sell some cologne.]
Joey  (to a guy) Bijan for men? (to a guy) Bijan for men? (To a woman) Bijan
for... (Sees it's a woman and stops.) (To Annabelle who walks up.) Hey, Annabelle, Uh,
listen, I was wondering if maybe after work you and I could go maybe grab a cup of coffee.
Annabelle  Oh, actually I sorta have plans.
Hombre Man  (entering) Ready, Annabelle?
Annabelle  You bet. (to Joey) Maybe some other time?
Joey  (To a co-worker) Hey, it's not the first time I lost a girl to a cowboy
spraying cologne. (A customer walks by.) Bijan for men? (The customer ignores him, and
Joey starts to chase him) Bijan for men?!
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's, Carol is dropping Ben off for Ross to watch.]
Carol  Ok, and this is Funny Clown. Funny Clown is only for after his naps, not
before his naps or he won't sleep.
Ross  Carol, we've been through this before, ok? We have a good time. We laugh,
we play. It's like we're father and son.
Susan  Honey, relax. Ross is great with him. (Ross looks at her.) Don't look so
surprised. I'm a lovely person.
Rachel  Oh, this is so cute.
Susan  Oh, I got that for him.
Ross  My mommies love me. That's clever.
Monica  Hello? Oh, Hi, Ju—(Sees Rachel is watching)—Hi, Jew! (Walks
into the kitchen.) (Listens.) Uh huh? (Listens.) Uh huh? (Listens) Ok. (Listens) Um, sure,
that'd be great. See ya then. Bye. (Hangs up.)
Rachel  Did you just say Hi, Jew?
Monica  Yes. Uh, yes, I did. That was my friend, Eddie Moskowitz. Yeah, he likes
it. Reaffirms his faith.
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's, Chandler, Rachel, and Joey are eating, and Phoebe is
preparing Ben's milk.]
Phoebe  Ben, dinner!
Ross  Thanks Aunt Pheebs. Hey, you didn't microwave that, did you, because it's
breast milk, and you're not supposed to do that.
Phoebe  Duh, I think I know how to heat breast milk. Ok. (Squirts some on her
wrist and tastes it.)
Chandler  What did you just do?
Phoebe  I licked my arm, what?
Ross  It's breast milk.
Phoebe  So?
Rachel  Phoebe, that is juice, squeezed from a person.
Joey  What is the big deal? (Tastes the breast milk.)
Chandler  What did you just do?
Ross  Ok, would people stop drinking the breast milk?
Phoebe  You won't even taste it?
Ross  No!
Phoebe  Not even if you just pretend that it's milk?
Ross  Not even if Carol's breast had a picture of a missing child on it.
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's, time lapse.  Rachel is entering the living room from
her bedroom as Monica enters.]
Monica  Hey, where is everybody?
Rachel  They took Ben to the park. Where've you been?
Monica  Just out. Had some lunch, just me, little quality time with me. Thanks
for your jacket.
Rachel  Oh, no problem. You can borrow it, by the way. (Puts her hand in the
pocket) Here are your keys, hon. (She takes the keys out, sets them on the counter, and
notices she also grabbed a receipt.)
Monica  Okay.
Rachel  Mon, if uh you were at lunch alone, how come it cost you uh 53
dollars?
Monica  You know what probably happened? Someone musta stolen my credit card.
Rachel  And sorta just put the receipt back in your pocket?
Monica  That is an excellent excellent question. That is excellent.
Rachel  Monica, what is with you? Who'd you have lunch with?
Monica  Judy.
Rachel  Who?
Monica  Julie.
Rachel  What?!
Monica  Jody!
Rachel  You were with Julie?
Monica  Look, when it started I was just trying to be nice to her because she
was my brother's girlfriend. And then, one thing led to another and, before I knew it, we
were...shopping.
Rachel  Oh. Oh my God.
Monica  Honey, wait. We only did it once. It didn't mean anything to me.
Rachel  Yeah, right.  Sure!
Monica  Really, Rachel, I was thinking of you the whole time. Look, I'm sorry,
all right. I never meant for you to find out!
Rachel  Oh, please, you wanted to get caught. (Waves the receipt)
Monica  That is not true!
Rachel  Oh, so you just sort of happened to leave it in here?
Monica  Did it ever occur to you that I might just be that stupid?
Rachel  Ok, Monica. I just have to know one thing. Did you go with her to Bloomingdale's?
(Monica looks away.) Oh! Ok, ok, ok, I just really, uh, I just really need to not be with
you right now. (Exits.)
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's, Ben is playing in his crib while Chandler and Ross are
leaning against the rim and are completely asleep.]
Monica  (on the phone) Hi, who's this? (Listens) Hi, Joanne. Is Rachel working?
It's Monica. (Listens) Yes, I know I did a horrible thing. (Listens) Joanne, it's not as
simple as all that, ok? (Listens) No, I don't care what Steve thinks. (Listens) Hi, Steve.
Carol and Susan  Hey! (This wakes Chandler and Ross up)
Carol  How did we do?
Phoebe  Oh, I tasted Ben's milk, and Ross freaked out.
Ross  I did not freak out.
Carol  Why'd you freak out?
Ross  Because it's breast milk. It's gross.
Carol  My breast milk is gross?
Susan  This should be fun.
Ross  No, no, Carol. There's nothing wrong with it. I just, I just don't think
breast milk is for adults.
Chandler  Of course the packaging does appeal to grown-ups and kids alike.
Carol  Ross, you're being silly. I've tried it, it's no big deal. Just taste it.
(Holding out a bottle.)
Ross  (jumping away) That would be no.
Phoebe  Come on. It doesn't taste bad.
Joey  Yeah, it's kinda sweet, sorta like, uh...
Susan  Cantaloupe juice.
Joey  Exactly.
Ross  (staring at Susan) You've tasted it? You've tasted it.
Susan  Uh huh.
Ross  Oh, you've tasted it.
Susan  You can keep saying it, but it won't stop being true.
Ross  (he rolls up his sleeve) Gimme the bottle. (Joey hands him the bottle and
Ross squirts some on his arm.) Gimme the towel. (Joey gives him the towel and he wipes it
off.)
[Scene  Chandler and Joey's, Chandler is wiping down the peninsula counter as Joey
enters dressed like a cowboy.]
Chandler  Howdy.
Joey  (sitting on the otherside of the counter from Chandler) Gimme a box a
juice. Well, they switched me over to Hombre.
Chandler  Well, maybe it's because of the way you're dressed.
Joey  Or maybe it's because this guy's doing so good they wanna put more people
on it. (Chandler pours some juice in a glass.) You should see this guy, Chandler, he goes
through two bottles a day.
Chandler  (slides the juice across the counter which Joey catches) What do you
care? You're an actor. This is your day job. This isn't supposed to mean anything to you.
Joey  I know, but, I was the best, you know? I liked being the best. (He downs
the glass of juice in one swig.) I don't know. Maybe I should just get outta the game.
They need guys up in housewares to serve cheese.
Chandler  (pours more and slides the refill to Joey) All right, say you do that.
You know sooner or later somebody's gonna come along that slices a better cheddar. And
then where're you gonna run?
Joey  Yeah I guess you're right.
Chandler  You're damn right I'm right. I say you show this guy what you're made
of. I say you stand your ground. I say you show him that you are the baddest hombre west
of the lingerie.
Joey  I'm gonna do it. (He downs the juice in one swig again.)
Chandler  All right. Now go see Miss Kitty and she'll fix you up with a nice
hooker.
[Scene  Outside Central Perk, Rachel is cleaning up and Monica is pleading with her.]
Monica  I don't know what else to say.
Rachel  Well that works out good, because I'm not listening.
Monica  I feel terrible, I really do.
Rachel  Oh, I'm sorry, did my back hurt your knife?
Monica  Rachel, (they go back inside) say that I'm friends with her, we spend
some time together. Is that so terrible?
Rachel  Yes.
Monica  It's that terrible?
Rachel  Yes. Monica, you don't get it. It's bad enough that she's stolen the guy
who might actually be the person that I am supposed to be with, but now, she's actually
(starting to cry), but now she's actually stealing you.
Monica  Me? What are you talking about? Nobody could steal me from you. I mean,
just because I'm friends with her doesn't make me any less friends with you. I mean,
(starting to cry) you're my...We're, we're...Oh, I love you.
Rachel  I love you too. (They hug.)
Phoebe  You guys, um I know that this really doesn't have anything to do with
me, but um I love you guys too. (Joins in on the hug.) Oh, I really needed that. (Goes and
sits down.)
Monica  Look, I know that you're in a place right now where you really need to
hate Julie's guts, but she didn't do anything wrong. I mean, she was just a girl who met a
guy, and now they go out. I really think that if you gave her a chance, you'd like her.
Would you just give that a chance, for me?
Rachel  (crying) I'd do anything for you, you know that.
Monica  (crying) I'd do anything for you. (They hug again.)
Phoebe  Wait, wait, wait, wait! (Runs over and joins in on the hug again.)
[Scene  The Department Store, Joey and the Hombre man are facing off in Joey's
section.]
Joey  Mornin'. (The Hombre man ignores him) I said, mornin'.
Hombre Man  I heard ya.
Store Guy  All right, everybody, I'm openin' the doors. You boys ready?
Hombre Man  Ready.
Joey  Yeah, I'm ready.
Customer  You idiot, you stupid cowboy, you blinded me, I'm suing!
Store Guy  Oh my god, Todd! What the hell did you do?
Hombre Man  I'm sorry. I am such a doofus. I'm so sorry, I'm so sorry.
Annabelle  (seeing the end result) My god, what happened?
Joey  These new kids, they never last. Sooner or later, they all...stop lastin'.
Listen, uh, what do you say I buy you that cup of coffee now?
Annabelle  Sure.
[Scene  Central Perk, Julie and Rachel are sitting on the couch.]
Julie  So.
Rachel  So. I just thought the two of us should hang out for a bit. I mean, you
know, we've never really talked. I guess you'd know that, being one of the two of us,
though, right?
Julie  I know, I probably shouldn't even tell you this, but I'm pretty much
totally intimidated by you.
Rachel  Really? Me?
Julie  Yes. Oh my god, are you kidding? Ross is so crazy about you, and I really
wanted you to like me, and, it's probably me being totally paranoid, but I kinda got the
feeling that maybe you don't.
Rachel  Well, you're not totally paranoid.
Julie  Oy.
Rachel  Um, ok, uh, oh god, um, when you and uh Ross first started going out, it
was really hard for me, um, for many reasons, which I'm not gonna bore you with now, but
um, I just, I see how happy he is, you know, and how good you guys are together, and um,
Monica's always saying how nice you are, and god I hate it when she's right.
Julie  Thanks. Hey, listen, would you like to go to a movie sometime or
something?
Rachel  Yeah, that'd be great. I'd love it.
Julie  I'd love it too. Shoot, I gotta go. So, I'll talk to you later.
Rachel  All right, Julie.
Julie  Bye. (Gets up.)
Rachel  Bye. (After Julie exits.) What a manipulative bitch.
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's, another showdown is occuring, only this time
its between Ross, a plate of cookies, and the breast milk.  They've been eyeing each
other for a while now, and Chandler and Joey are getting bored.  He checks his Ross
and in frustration, shoves his watch in front of Ross's eyes as if saying, "Hurry it
up already!"  Finally, Ross scratches his head, does that again, itches his
nose, scratches his head, grabs the bottle, takes a big swig, and piles several cookies
into his mouth.]
Ross  (with a mouthful) That's not bad.
Originally written by Michael Curtis and Greg Malins
Trascribed by Mindy Mattingly Phillips 
With Minor Adjustments by  Eric Aasen
CHANDLER  Hey.
MONICA  So how was Joan?
CHANDLER  I broke up with her.
CHANDLER  They were huge. When she sneezed, bats flew out of them.
RACHEL  Come on, they were not that huge.
CHANDLER  I'm tellin' you, she leaned back, I could see her brain.
MONICA  How many perfectly fine women are you gonna reject over the most superficial
insignificant things?
JOEY  Hold it hold it. I gotta side with Chandler on this one. When I first moved to
the city, I went out a couple of times with this girl, really hot, great kisser, but she
had the biggest Adam's apple. It made me nuts.
CHANDLER  You or me?
ROSS  I got it. Uh, Joey, women don't have Adam's apples.
JOEY  You guys are messin' with me, right?
ALL  Yeah.
JOEY  That was a good one. For a second there, I was like, "whoa."
PHOEBE  You name one woman that you broke up with for a real reason.
CHANDLER  Maureen Rosilla.
ROSS  Not hating Yanni is not a real reason.
MONICA  Hello, Mr. Heckles.
MR. HECKLES  You're doing it again.
MONICA  We're not doing anything.
MR. HECKLES  You're stomping. It's disturbing my birds.
RACHEL  You don't have birds.
MR. HECKLES  I could have birds.
MONICA  Ok, Mr. Heckles, we'll try to keep it down.
MR. HECKLES  Thank you. I'm going to rejoin my dinner party.
RACHEL  All right, bye-bye.
CHANDLER  Ok, Janice. Janice. You gotta give me Janice. That wasn't about being picky.
ROSS  We'll give you Janice.
PHOEBE  I miss Janice though. "Hello, Chandler Bing."
RACHEL  "Oh, my, god."
JOEY  "Oh, Chandler, now, now, that's it. There, faster!"
MONICA  Stop with the broom, we're not making noise.
RACHEL  We won. We won!
MONICA  Mr. Heckles.
RACHEL  How did this happen?
MR. TREEGER  He musta been sweepin'. They found a broom in his hand.
MONICA  That's terrible.
MR. TREEGER  You never know.
PHOEBE  Ok, it's very faint, but I can still sense him in the building. Go into the
light, Mr. Heckles!
CHANDLER  Ok, Phoebe.
PHOEBE  I'm sorry, but sometimes they need help. That's fine. Go ahead and scoff. You
know, there're a lot of things that I don't believe in, but that doesn't mean they're not
true.
JOEY  Such as?
PHOEBE  Like crop circles, or the Bermuda triangle, or evolution?
ROSS  Whoa, whoa, whoa. What, you don't, uh, you don't believe in evolution?
PHOEBE  Nah. Not really.
ROSS  You don't believe in evolution?
PHOEBE  I don't know, it's just, you know...monkeys, Darwin, you know, it's a, it's a
nice story, I just think it's a little too easy.
ROSS  Too easy? Too...The process of every living thing on this planet evolving over
millions of years from single-celled organisms, too easy?
PHOEBE  Yeah, I just don't buy it.
ROSS  Uh, excuse me. Evolution is not for you to buy, Phoebe. Evolution is scientific
fact, like, like, like the air we breathe, like gravity.
PHOEBE  Ok, don't get me started on gravity.
ROSS  You uh, you don't believe in gravity?
PHOEBE  Well, it's not so much that you know, like I don't believe in it, you know,
it's just...I don't know, lately I get the feeling that I'm not so much being pulled down
as I am being pushed.
CHANDLER  Uh-Oh. It's Isaac Newton, and he's pissed.
MR. TREEGER  There she is. And over there, that's the other one. This is Mr. Buddy
Boyle, Mr. Heckles' attorney. He'd like to talk to you.
MONICA  What can we do for you?
MR. BOYLE  All right, kids. Here's the deal. According to my client's will, he wants to
leave all his earthly possessions to "the noisy girls in the apartment above
mine".
MONICA  Well, what about his family?
MR. BOYLE  He didn't have any.
RACHEL  Ok, so let's talk money.
MR. BOYLE  All right, there was none. Let's talk signing. You be noisy girl number one,
you be noisy girl number two.
MONICA  I can't believe that this whole time we thought he hated us. I mean, isn't it
amazing how much you can touch someone's life, without even knowing it?...Would you look
at this dump? He hated us. This is his final revenge!
RACHEL  Have you ever seen so much crap?
CHANDLER  Actually, I think this apartment sullies the good name of crap
JOEY  Check this out. Can I have this?
ROSS  How can you not believe in evolution?
PHOEBE  Just don't. Look at this funky shirt!
ROSS  Pheebs, I have studied evolution my entire adult life. Ok, I can tell you, we
have collected fossils from all over the world that actually show the evolution of
different species, ok? You can literally see them evolving through time.
PHOEBE  Really? You can actually see it?
ROSS  You bet. In the U.S., China, Africa, all over.
PHOEBE  See, I didn't know that.
ROSS  Well, there you go.
PHOEBE  Huh. So now, the real question is, who put those fossils there, and why?
CHANDLER  Hey, look at this. "My Big Book of Grievances."
JOEY  Hey, there's me! April 17th. Excessive noise. Italian guy comes homes with a
date. Hey Chandler, look, you're in here too.
CHANDLER  April 18th, excessive noise. Italian guy's gay roommate comes home with the
dry-cleaning. Well that's excellent.
RACHEL  Monica, Monica, look at this lamp. Is this tacky or what? We have to have this.
MONICA  Rache, I think we have enough regular lamps.
RACHEL  What? Come on, it's not like I'm asking for this girly clock or anything,
which, by the way, I also think is very cool.
MONICA  It doesn't go with any of my stuff.
RACHEL  Well, what about my stuff?
MONICA  You don't have any stuff.
RACHEL  You still think of it as your apartment, don't you?
MONICA  No.
RACHEL  Yes you do. You think of it as your apartment, and I'm just somebody who rents
a room.
MONICA  Mmmmm.
RACHEL  Ok, while you "mmm" on it for awhile, I'm gonna go find a place for
my new lamp.
ROSS  Ok, Pheebs. See how I'm making these little toys move? Opposable thumbs. Without
evolution, how do you explain opposable thumbs?
PHOEBE  Maybe the overlords needed them to steer their spacecrafts.
ROSS  Please tell me you're joking.
PHOEBE  Look, can't we just say that you believe in something, and I don't.
ROSS  No, no, Pheebs, we can't, ok, because--
PHOEBE  What is this obsessive need you have to make everyone agree with you? No,
what's that all about? I think, I think maybe it's time you put Ross under the microscope.
ROSS  Is there blood coming out of my ears?
JOEY  Check it out, check it out. Heckles' high school yearbook.
CHANDLER  Wow, he looks so normal.
PHOEBE  He's even kind of cute.
JOEY  "Heckles, you crack me up in science class. You're the funniest kid in
school.
CHANDLER  Funniest? Heckles?
JOEY  That's what it says.
CHANDLER  Wow, Heckles was voted class clown, and so was I. He was right. Would you
listen to that?
PHOEBE  I'd call that excessive.
CHANDLER  Whoa!
JOEY  What?
CHANDLER  Heckles played clarinet in band, and I played clarinet. And he was in the
scale modeler's club, and I was, well, there was no club, but I sure thought they were
cool.
JOEY  So, you were both dorks. Big deal.
CHANDLER  I just think it's weird, you know? Heckles and me, Heckles, and me, me and
Heckles...Would you knock it off?
JOEY  Have you been here all night?
CHANDLER  Look at this. Pictures of all the women that Heckles went out with. Look what
he wrote on them. Vivian, too tall. Madge, big gums. Too loud, too smart, makes noise when
she eats. This is, this is me. This is what I do. I'm gonna end up alone, just like he
did.
JOEY  Chandler, Heckles was a nut case.
CHANDLER  Our trains are on the same track, ok? Yeah, sure, I'm coming up 30 years
behind him, but the stops are all the same. Bitter Town. Aloneville. Hermit Junction.
JOEY  All right, you know what we gotta do? We gotta get you outta here. Come on, I'll
buy you breakfast, let's go.
CHANDLER  What if I never find someone? Or worse, what if I've found her, but I dumped
her because she pronounced it "supposably"?
JOEY  Chandler, come on, you're gonna find somebody.
CHANDLER  How do you know that? How?
JOEY  I don't know, I'm just tryin' to help you out.
CHANDLER  You'll see, you guys are all gonna go off and get married, and I'm gonna end
up alone. Will you promise me something? When you're married, will you invite me over for
holidays?
JOEY  Well, I don't know. I don't know what we're gonna be doin'. I mean, what if we're
at her folks' place?
CHANDLER  Yeah, I understand.
JOEY  You can come over and watch the Super Bowl. Every year, all right?
CHANDLER  You know what? I'm not gonna end up like this. I'll see you man.
JOEY  Supposably. Supposably. Did they go to the zoo? Supposably.
CHANDLER  (on phone) Hi, it's me.
JANICE  Oh, my, god.
PHOEBE  Janice? You called Janice?
CHANDLER  Yes, Janice. Why is that so difficult for you to comprehend?
ROSS  You remember Janice, right?
CHANDLER  Yes. She was smart, she was pretty, and she honestly cared about me. Janice
is my last chance to have somebody.
JANICE  Helloo!!
CHANDLER  Oh, my, god!
JOEY  Geez, look how fat she got.
JANICE  Hey, it's everybody.
CHANDLER  Janice, you're--
JANICE  Yes, I am.
CHANDLER  Is it--?
JANICE  Is it yours? Ha! You wish, Chandler Bing. You are looking at a married lady
now.
CHANDLER  Congratulations.
JANICE  Oh, sweetie, I'm sorry.
CHANDLER  You couldn't have told me about this on the phone?
JANICE  And what? Missed the expression on your face? Janice likes to have her fun.
MONICA  Hey, Rache. You know what we haven't played in a while?
RACHEL  What?
MONICA  Hide the Lamp.
RACHEL  Monica, let it go.
MONICA  Did you know I was allergic to shellfish?
RACHEL  Well, then, you'll just have to eat the other lamps.
PHOEBE  Uh-oh. It's Scary Scientist Man.
ROSS  Ok, Phoebe, this is it. In this briefcase I carry actual scientific facts. A
briefcase of facts, if you will. Some of these fossils are over 200 million years old.
PHOEBE  Ok, look, before you even start, I'm not denying evolution, ok, I'm just saying
that it's one of the possibilities.
ROSS  It's the only possibility, Phoebe.
PHOEBE  Ok, Ross, could you just open your mind like this much, ok? Wasn't there a time
when the brightest minds in the world believed that the world was flat? And, up until like
what, 50 years ago, you all thought the atom was the smallest thing, until you split it
open, and this like, whole mess of crap came out. Now, are you telling me that you are so
unbelievably arrogant that you can't admit that there's a teeny tiny possibility that you
could be wrong about this?
ROSS  There might be, a teeny, tiny, possibility.
PHOEBE  I can't believe you caved.
ROSS  What?
PHOEBE  You just abandoned your whole belief system. I mean, before, I didn't agree
with you, but at least I respected you. How, how, how are you going to go into work
tomorrow? How, how are you going to face the other science guys? How, how are you going to
face yourself? Oh! That was fun. So who's hungry?
RACHEL  I am. Let me just get my coat.
MONICA  Ok, all right. It was an accident, I swear, all right. I was putting on my
jacket, and the thing, and the lamp, and it broke.
RACHEL  Oh, please, Monica. You've always hated my lamp, and then, all of a sudden,
it's just magically broken?
MONICA  Phoebe, tell her!
PHOEBE  Ok, I didn't see it, because I was putting on my jacket, but I uh want to
believe you.
RACHEL  Hey Chandler. Monica just broke my seashell lamp.
CHANDLER  Neat. I'm gonna die alone.
RACHEL  Ok, you win.
MONICA  Chandler, you're not gonna die alone.
CHANDLER  Janice was my safety net, ok? And now I have to get a snake.
PHOEBE  Uh huh. Why is that?
CHANDLER  If I'm gonna be an old, lonely man, I'm gonna need a thing, you know, a hook,
like that guy on the subway who eats his own face. So I figure I'll be Crazy Man with a
Snake, y=know. Crazy Snake Man. And I'll get more snakes, call them my babies, kids will
walk past my place, they will run. "Run away from Crazy Snake Man," they'll
shout!
MONICA  You have got to get over this. You're not gonna end up alone.
CHANDLER  Of course I am. I reject anyone who's crazy enough to actually go out with
me, and then I bitch about the fact that there aren't any great women out there.
RACHEL  Chandler, you have just described virtually every man that we have ever gone
out with.
MONICA  You are not a freak. You're a guy.
RACHEL  She's right. She's right. You are no different than the rest of them.
MONICA  Wait a minute, wait a minute. Yes he is. You are totally different.
CHANDLER  In a bad way?
MONICA  No, honey, in a wonderful way. You know what you want now. Most guys don't even
have a clue. You are ready to take risks, you are ready to be vulnerable, and intimate
with someone.
RACHEL  Yeah. You're not gonna end up alone.
PHOEBE  Chandler, you called Janice! That's how much you wanted to be with someone!
MONICA  You made it!
PHOEBE  You're there!
RACHEL  You are ready to make a commitment!
CHANDLER  Whoa! Don't know about that.
RACHEL  What you got there? Something else that's not yours that you can break?
MONICA  No. Um, I know you like this, and I want you to have it. I think it'll look
good in our apartment.
RACHEL  Thank you.
MONICA  That's fine.
CHANDLER  Hey. Well, you will all be pleased to know that I have a date tomorrow night.
This woman, Alison, from work. She's great. She's pretty, she's smart. And uh, I've been
holding off on asking her out in the past, because she has an unusually large head. But,
I'm not gonna let that stuff hang me up anymore. Look at me. I'm growing.
JOEY  Hey, uh, you can't recycle yearbooks, can you?
CHANDLER  I'll take that.
JOEY  You want his yearbook?
CHANDLER  Yeah, yeah. Some people said some nice things about him. I think somebody
should have it.
MONICA  Oh, gosh, this is so weird. I mean, his whole life was in this apartment, and
now it's gone. You know, I think it would be nice if we just took a few moments, for Mr.
Heckles. I mean, he was kind of a pain, he was, but, he was a person. You're all going to
hell.
RACHEL  It's really not that big!
CHANDLER  Takin' that with you, huh?
JOEY  Oh, yeah.
ROSS  You comin'?
CHANDLER  Yeah, jus' second. Good-bye Mr. Heckles. We'll try to keep it down.
ALISON  Oh, my major was totally useless. I mean, how often do you look in the
classifieds and see "Philosopher wanted"?
[Scene  At Chandler and Joey's. Ross and Chandler are there. Ross is watching
wrestling.]
ROSS  Man, I sure miss Julie.
CHANDLER  Spanish midgets. Spanish midgets wrestling. Julie. Ok, yes, I see how you got
there. (phone rings)
ROSS  You ever figure out what that thing's for?
CHANDLER  No, see, I'm trying this new screening thing. You know, I figure if I'm
always answering the phone, people'll think I don't have a life. My god, Rodrigo never
gets pinned.
(MACHINE--JOEY'S VOICE)  Here comes the beep, you know what to do.
JADE  Hello, I'm looking for Bob. This is Jane. I don't know if you're still at this
number, but I was just thinking about us, and how great it was, and, well, I know it's
been three years, but, I was kinda hoping we could hook up again. I barely had t he nerve
to make this call, so you know what I did?
CHANDLER  What?
JADE  I got a little drunk...and naked.
CHANDLER  Bob here.
CHANDLER  (on phone) What've you been up to?
JADE  Oh, you know, the usual, teaching aerobics, partying way too much. Oh, and in
case you were wondering, those are my legs on the new James Bond poster.
CHANDLER  Can you hold on a moment? I have another call. (to Ross) I love her.
ROSS  I know.
CHANDLER  I'm back.
JADE  So, are we gonna get together or what?
CHANDLER  Um, absolutely. Uh, how 'bout tomorrow afternoon? Do you know uh, Central
Perk in the Village, say, five-ish?
JADE  Great, I'll see you then.
CHANDLER  Ok. Ok. Having a phone has finally paid off.
ROSS  Even though you do do a good Bob impression, I'm thinkin' when she sees you
tomorow, she's probably gonna realize, "hey, you're not Bob."
CHANDLER  I'm hoping that when Bob doesn't show up, she will seek comfort in the open
arms of the wry stranger at the next table.
ROSS  Oh my god. You are pure evil.
CHANDLER  Ok, pure evil, horny and alone. I've done this.
ROSS  (on phone) Yeah, yeah, everybody's here. Hey, everybody, say hi to Julie in New
Mexico.
ALL  Hi, Julie!
RACHEL  (sarcastically) Hi, Julie.
CHANDLER  Ok, while Ross is on the phone, everybody owes me 62 bucks for his birthday.
PHOEBE  Um, is, is there any chance that you're rounding up? You know, like from, like
20?
CHANDLER  Hey, come on, we got the gift, the concert, and the cake.
JOEY  Do we need a cake?
CHANDLER  Look guys, I know it's a little steep.
RACHEL  Yeah, whoosh!
CHANDLER  But it's Ross.
PHOEBE  It's Ross.
JOEY  All right.
CHANDLER  I'll see you guys later, I gotta go...do a thing.
ROSS  Ok, sweetheart, I'll call you later tonight. Whoa, whoa, whoa, hey, hey, hey,
you're not really gonna go through with this, are you?
CHANDLER  You know, I think I might just.
RACHEL  So uh, what are you guys doing for dinner tonight?
JOEY  Well I guess I gotta start savin' up for Ross's birthday, so I guess I'll just
stay home and eat dust bunnies.
PHOEBE  Can you believe how much this is gonna cost?
RACHEL  Do you guys ever get the feeling that um, Chandler and those guys just don't
get that we don't make as much money as they do?
JOEY  Yes! Yeah, it's like they're always saying "let's go here, let's go
there". Like we can afford to go here and there.
PHOEBE  Yes, yes, and it's, and we always have to go to, you know, someplace nice, you
know? God, and it's not like we can say anything about it, 'cause, like this birthday
thing, it's for Ross.
JOEY  For Ross.
RACHEL  For Ross, Ross, Ross.
MONICA  (enters) Oh my god.
RACHEL  Hey.
JOEY  Hi.
RACHEL  What?
MONICA  I'm at work, ordinary day, you know, chop chop chop, sauti, sauti, sauti. All
of a sudden, Leon, the manager, calls me into his office. It turns out they fired the head
lunch chef, and guess who got the job.
JOEY  If it's not you, this is a horrible story.
MONICA  Fortunately, it is me. And, they made me head of purchasing, thank you very
much. Anyway, I just ran into Ross and Chandler downstairs, and they think we should go
out and celebrate. You know, someplace nice.
JOEY  Yeah, someplace nice. (to Phoebe and Rachel) How much do you think I can get for
my kidney? (at Central Perk)
ROSS  I'm tellin' you. You can't do this.
CHANDLER  Oh, come on. I can never get a girl like that with conventional methods.
ROSS  That doesn't matter. She wanted to call Bob. Hey, for all we know, Bob is who she
was meant to be with. You may be destroying two people's chance for happiness.
CHANDLER  We don't know Bob, ok? We know me. We like me. Please let me be happy.
ROSS  Go over there and tell that woman the truth.
CHANDLER  All right.
ROSS  Go.
CHANDLER  Hi.
JADE  Hi.
CHANDLER  Listen, I have to, uh, um, I have to, I have to confess something.
JADE  Yes?
CHANDLER  Whoever stood you up is a jerk.
JADE  How did you--?
CHANDLER  I don't know. I just had this weird sense. You know, but that's me. I'm weird
and sensitive. Tissue?
JADE  Thanks.
CHANDLER  No, you keep the pack. I'm all cried out today.
ROSS  Ok, ok, here is to my sister, the newly-appointed head lunch chef--
MONICA  Who is also in charge of purchasing.
ROSS  Newly appointed head lunch chef who is also in charge of purchasing--
MONICA  Who has her own little desk when Roland's not there.
ROSS  Uh, lunch chef, purchasing, own little desk when Roland's not there. Here's to my
little sister--
MONICA  Oh, wait, and I got a beeper!
JOEY  Cool.
PHOEBE  Let's see!
ROSS  That's fine, I'll just wait!
MONICA  Oh, sorry.
JOEY  Sorry, sorry.
ROSS  Monica!
WAITER  Are we ready to order?
RACHEL  Oh, you know what, we haven't even looked yet.
WAITER  Well, when you do, just let me know. I'll be right over there on the edge of my
seat.
PHOEBE  Wow, look at these prices.
RACHEL  Yeah, these are pretty ch-ching.
JOEY  What are these, like famous chickens?
CHANDLER  Hey, sorry I'm late. Congratulations, Mon. (to Ross) I'm not sorry I'm late.
How incredible was my afternoon with Jade?
ROSS  Well, pretty incredible according to the message she left you on my machine. Hey,
Chandler, why is this woman leaving a message for you on my machine?
CHANDLER  Oh, see, I had to tell her that my number was your number, because I couldn't
tell her that my number was my number because she thinks that my number is Bob's number.
ROSS  Hey, tell me again, what do I do when Mr. Roper calls?
WAITER  Do I dare ask?
MONICA  Yes, I will start with the carpaccio, and then I'll have the grilled prawns.
ROSS  That sounds great. Same for me.
WAITER  And for the gentleman?
JOEY  Yeah, I'll have the Thai chicken pizza. But, hey, look, if I get it without the
nuts and leeks and stuff, is it cheaper?
WAITER  You'd think, wouldn't you? Miss?
RACHEL  Ok, I will have the uh, (whispers) side salad.
WAITER  (whispers) And what will that be on the side of?
RACHEL  Uh, I don't know. Why don't you put it right here next to my water?
WAITER  And for you?
PHOEBE  Um, I'm gonna have a cup of the cucumber soup, and, um, take care.
CHANDLER  I will have the uh, Cajun catfish.
WAITER  Anything else?
CHANDLER  Yes, how 'bout a verse of Killing Me Softly. You're gonna sneeze on my fish,
aren't you?
ROSS  (using calculator) Plus tip, divided by six. Ok, everyone owes 28 bucks.
RACHEL  Um, everyone?
ROSS  Oh, you're right, I'm sorry.
JOEY  Thank you.
ROSS  Monica's big night, she shouldn't pay.
MONICA  Oh, thank you!
ROSS  So five of us is, $33.50 apiece.
PHOEBE  No, huh uh, no way, I'm sorry, not gonna happen.
CHANDLER  Whoa, whoa, prom night flashback.
PHOEBE  I'm sorry, Monica, I'm really happy you got promoted, but cold cucumber mush
for thirty-something bucks? No! Rachel just had that, that, that salad, and, and Joey with
his like teeny pizza! It's just...
ROSS  Ok, Pheebs! How 'bout we'll each just pay for what we had. It's no big deal.
PHOEBE  Not for you.
MONICA  All right, what's goin' on?
RACHEL  Ok, look you guys, I really don't want to get into this right now. I think
it'll just make everyone uncomfortable.
PHOEBE  Fine. All right, fine.
JOEY  Yeah.
CHANDLER  You can tell us.
ROSS  Hello, it's us, all right? It'll be fine.
JOEY  Ok, um, uh, we three feel like, that uh, sometimes you guys don't get that uh, we
don't have as much money as you.
MONICA  Ok.
ROSS  I hear ya.
CHANDLER  We can talk about that.
PHOEBE  Well, then...Let's.
ROSS  I, I just never think of money as an issue.
RACHEL  That's 'cause you have it.
ROSS  That's a good point.
CHANDLER  So um, how come you guys haven't talked about this before?
JOEY  'Cause it's always somethin', you know, like Monica's new job, or the whole
Ross's birthday hoopla.
ROSS  Wha--? Whoa, hey, I don't want my birthday to be the source of any kind of
negative--there's gonna be a hoopla?
RACHEL  Basically, there's the thing, and then there's the stuff after the thing.
MONICA  If it makes anybody feel better, then we can just forget the thing, and we'll
just do the gift.
ROSS  G-gift? The thing's not the gift?
CHANDLER  No, the thing was, we were gonna go see Hootie and the Blowfish.
ROSS  Hootie and the--oh my. I, I can catch them on the radio.
PHOEBE  No, now I feel bad. You wanna go to the concert.
ROSS  No, look, hey, it's my birthday, and the important thing is that we all be
together.
MONICA  All of us.
CHANDLER  Together.
ROSS  Not at the concert.
RACHEL  Ok.
JOEY  Yeah.
RACHEL  Thank you.
JOEY  Thanks.
PHOEBE  Yeah.
CHANDLER  So, the ebola virus. That's gotta suck, huh?
CHANDLER  Gee, Monica, what's in the bag?
MONICA  I don't know, Chandler. Let's take a look.
PHOEBE  Oh, it's like a skit.
MONICA  Why, it's dinner for six. 5 steaks, and an eggplant for Phoebe.
ROSS  Whoo!
PHOEBE  Cool.
MONICA  Yeah, we switched meat suppliers at work, and the new guys gave me the steaks
as sort of a thank-you.
ROSS  But wait, there's more. Hey, Chandler, what is in the envelope?
CHANDLER  By the way, this didn't seem so dorky in the hall.
ROSS  Come on.
CHANDLER  Why, it's six tickets to Hootie and the Blowfish! The Blowfish!
MONICA  It's on us, all right, so don't worry. It's our treat.
PHOEBE  So...Thank you.
ROSS  Could you be less enthused?
JOEY  Look, it's a nice gesture, it is. But it just feels like--
MONICA  Like?
JOEY  Charity.
MONICA  Charity?
ROSS  We're just tryin' to do a nice thing here.
RACHEL  Ross, you have to understand that your nice thing makes us feel this big.
PHOEBE  Actually, it makes us feel that big.
ROSS  I don't, I don't understand. I mean, you, it's like we can't win with you guys.
CHANDLER  If you guys feel this big, maybe that's not our fault. Maybe that's just how
you feel.
JOEY  Oh, now you're tellin' us how you feel.
RACHEL  Ok, we never shoulda talked about this.
PHOEBE  I'm just gonna pass on the concert, 'cause I'm just not in a very Hootie place
right now.
RACHEL  Me neither.
JOEY  Me too.
MONICA  Guys, we bought the tickets.
PHOEBE  Oh, well, then you'll have extra seats, you know, for all your tiaras and
stuff.
CHANDLER  Why did you look at me when you said that?
MONICA  Well, I guess now we can't go.
RACHEL  What? Come on, you do what you want to do. Do we always have to do everything
together?
MONICA  You know what? You're right.
PHOEBE  Fine.
ROSS  Fine.
JOEY  Fine.
CHANDLER  Fine.
RACHEL  Fine.
MONICA  All right. We're gonna go. It's not for another six hours. We're gonna go then.
ROSS  Chandler!
CHANDLER  Yeah?
ROSS  Geez! Are you ready?
CHANDLER  Yeah. Just let me grab my jacket and tell you I had sex today.
ROSS  Whoa! You had sex today?
CHANDLER  Wow, it sounds even cooler when somebody else says it. I was awesome, ok? She
was biting her lip to stop from screaming.
ROSS  Wow.
CHANDLER  Now I know it's been awhile, but I took it as a good sign.
ROSS  Still doing the screening thing?
CHANDLER  I had sex today. I never have to answer that phone again.
MACHINE  Here comes the beep, you know what to do.
JADE  Hey, Bob, it's Jade. Listen, I just wanted to tell you that I was really hurt
when you didn't show up the other day, and just so you know, I ended up meeting a guy.
CHANDLER  Bob here.
JADE  Oh, hi.
CHANDLER  So, uh, you met someone, huh?
JADE  Yes, yes, I did. In fact, I had sex with him 2 hours ago.
CHANDLER  So, uh, how was he?
JADE  Eh.
CHANDLER  Eh?
JADE  Oh, Bob, he was nothing compared to you. I had to bite my lip to keep from
screaming your name.
CHANDLER  Well, that makes me feel so good.
JADE  It was just so awkward and bumpy.
ROSS  (silently mouthing) Bumpy?
CHANDLER  Well, maybe he had some kind of uh, new, cool style, that you're not familiar
with. And uh maybe you have to get used to it.
JADE  Well there really wasn't much time to get used to it, you know what I mean?
MONICA  You know what? I'm not gonna be able to enjoy this.
ROSS  Yeah, I know, it's my birthday. We all should be here.
CHANDLER  So, let's go.
ROSS  Well maybe, you know, maybe we should stay for one song.
CHANDLER  Yeah, I mean, it would be rude to them for us to leave now.
MONICA  You know, the guys are probably having a great time.
JOEY  Come on you guys, one more time.
PHOEBE  Ok. One.
JOEY  Nooo.
MONICA  That was amazing!
ROSS  Excellent, that was excellent.
CHANDLER  I can't believe the guys missed this.
ROSS  What guys? Oh, yeah.
STEVE  Excuse me, you're Monica Geller aren't you?
MONICA  Do I know you?
STEVE  You used to be my babysitter.
MONICA  Oh my god, little Stevie Fisher? How've you been?
STEVE  Good, good, I'm a lawyer now.
MONICA  You can't be a lawyer. You're eight.
STEVE  Listen, it was nice to see you. I gotta run backstage.
MONICA  Uh, wait, backstage?
STEVE  Oh, yeah, my firm represents the band.
ROSS  Ross.
CHANDLER  Chandler.
STEVE  How are you? Look, you guys wanna meet the group? Come on. So, are you one of
the ones who fooled around with my dad?
ROSS  Hey, you guys.
RACHEL  Happy birthday.
ROSS  Oh, thank you, thanks. So uh, how was your night last night?
RACHEL  Oh, well, it pretty much sucked. How was yours?
MONICA  Yeah, ours pretty much sucked, oh, but, I did run into little Stevie Fisher.
Remember him?
RACHEL  Oh yeah. I used to babysit him. Hey, how's his dad?
MONICA  Uh, good.
ROSS  Uh, aside from that, the whole evening was pretty much a bust.
CHANDLER  Yeah, we really missed you guys.
JOEY  Yeah, look, we were just saying, this whole thing is really stupid.
PHOEBE  We just have to really, really, really, not let stuff like money get--is that a
hickey?
MONICA  No, I just, I fell down.
RACHEL  On someone's lips? Where'd you get the hickey?
MONICA  You know, a party, or--
RACHEL  What party?
ROSS  It wasn't so much a party as...a gathering of people, with food, and music, and,
and the band.
JOEY  You partied with Hootie and the Blowfish?
CHANDLER  Yes, apparently Stevie and the band are like this.
RACHEL  Who gave you that hickey?
MONICA  That would be the work of a Blowfish.
RACHEL  Oh!
PHOEBE  Oh! I can't believe it. I can't believe this. We're just like, sitting at home,
trying to guess Joey's fingers, and you guys are out like partying and having fun, and you
know, all, "hey, Blowfish, suck on my neck".
ROSS  Look, don't blame us. You guys coulda been there, you know.
RACHEL  What, as part of your poor friends outreach program?
MONICA  It's work.
CHANDLER  I don't know what to say. I'm sorry that we make more money than you. But
we're not gonna feel guilty about it. We work really hard for it.
JOEY  And we don't work hard?
MONICA  (on phone) Yeah, hi, it's Monica. I just got a page.
CHANDLER  I'm just saying that sometimes we like to do stuff that costs a little more.
JOEY  And you feel like we hold you back.
CHANDLER  Yes.
RACHEL  Oh!
CHANDLER  No.
MONICA  Leon, Leon. Shhh! Guys. Wait, I don't understand. Those steaks were just a gift
from the meat vendor. That was not a kick back. I'll just replace them and we can forget
the whole thing. What corporate policy? No. Yeah. All right. I just got fired.
PHOEBE  Oh.
WAITRESS  Here's your check. That'll be $4.12.
JOEY  Let me get that. (to Chandler) You got five bucks?
MACHINE  Here comes the beep, you know what to do.
JADE  Hi, it's me. Listen, Bob. I'm probably way out of line here. I mean, It has been
3 years, and you're probably seeing someone else now, but if we could just have one night
together, just for old time's sake, one hot, steamy, wild night...
[Scene  At Monica and Rachel's.]
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's apartment. Phoebe, Monica, and Rachel are there, discussing
the night before.]
RACH  Ross kissed me.
MNCA  Oh my god, oh my god, oh my god!
RACH  It was unbelievable!
MNCA  Oh my god, oh my god, oh my god!
PHOE  Ok, all right. We want to hear everything. Monica, get the wine and unplug the
phone. Rachel, does this end well or do we need to get tissues?
RACH  Oh, it ended very well.
PHOE  Oh.
MNCA  [getting the wine] Do not start without me. Do not start without me.
PHOE  Ok, all right, let's hear about the kiss. Was it like, was it like a soft brush
against your lips? Or was it like a, you know, a "I gotta have you now" kind of
thing?
RACH  Well, at first it was really intense, you know. And then, oh, god, and then we
just sort of sunk into it.
PHOE  Ok, so, ok, was he holding you? Or was his hand like on your back?
RACH  No, actually first they started on my waist. And then, they slid up, and then,
they were in my hair.
PHOE/MNCA  Ohhhh.
[Scene  Ross' apartment. Ross, Chandler, and Joey are there eating pizza.]
ROSS  And, uh, and then I kissed her.
JOEY  Tongue?
ROSS  Yeah.
JOEY  Cool.
[Scene  Central Perk. Joey, Phoebe, Monica, and Chandler are there; Chandler is
showing everyone his new computer.]
CHAN  All right, check out this bad boy. 12 megabytes of ram. 500 megabyte hard drive.
Built-in spreadsheet capabilities and a modem that transmits at over 28,000 b.p.s.
PHOE  Wow. What are you gonna use it for?
CHAN  [doggedly] Games and stuff.
MNCA  [reading the paper] There are no jobs. There are no jobs for me.
JOEY  [reading over her shoulder] Wait, here's one. Uh, would you be willing to cook
naked?
MNCA  There's an ad for a naked chef?
JOEY  No, but if you're willing to cook naked, then you might be willing to dance
naked. And then... [rubs his fingers together]
ROSS  Hi.
PHOE  Hey, oh, so, um...how'd you make out last night?
ROSS  That, that is funny. That is painfully funny. No, wait. Wait, yeah, that's just
painful
MNCA  Wait a minute. I thought last night was great.
ROSS  Yeah, it was, but...I get home, ok, and I see Julie's saline solution on my night
table. And I'm thinking to myself, oh my god, what the hell am I doing? I mean, here I am,
I am with Julie, this incredible, great woman, who I care about and who cares about me,
and I'm like, what, am I just gonna throw all that away?
JOEY  You got all that from saline solution?
MNCA  We are talking about Rachel here. You and Rachel.
ROSS  Believe me, I've been dreaming about me and Rachel for ten years now. But now,
I'm with Julie, so it's like me and Julie, me and Rachel, me and Julie, me and... [Rachel
enters, carrying a tray]... Rachel. Rachel, Rachel.
RACH  [to Ross] Hey, you.
ROSS  How are you?
RACH  Good. How are you?
ROSS  Good.
JULIE  Hi, honey.
ROSS  Hi, Julie. [nervous] Hi, Julie. Julie, um, how are you?
JULIE  Good.
ROSS  [uncomfortable] Good, so everybody's here. Everybody's good. So, were you gonna
play something, Phoebe?
PHOE  Oh, well, actually.
ROSS  [impatient] Play it.
PHOE  Ok, all right.
JOEY  Hey, Julie, I didn't know you wore lenses.
JULIE  What?
ROSS  [to Joey] Ssshh.
PHOE  Ok, um, hi, hello, hi, ok, so, um, this is a song about a love triangle between
three people that I made up. Um, it's called, um, "Two of Them Kissed Last
Night".
PHOE  [singing] There was a girl, we'll call her Betty, and a guy let's call him Neil.
Now I can't stress this point too strongly, this story isn't real. Now our Neil must
decide, who will be the girl that he casts aside. Will Betty be the one who he loves
truly? Or will it be the one who we'll call Ju...Loolie? He must decide, he must decide,
even though I made him up, he must decide!
[Scene  Mr. Ratstatter's (RTST) office. Monica is there about a job.]
RTST  This is a nice resume. Nice, nice, nice. Muy impressivo.
MNCA  So, Mr. Rastatter, what exactly does this job entail? The ad wasn't too clear.
RTST  Mockolate.
MNCA  I'm sorry?
RTST  Mockolate. It's a completely synthetic chocolate substitute.
MNCA  Ohh.
RTST  Go ahead. Try a piece. Yeah, we think that Mockolate is even better than
chocolate.
MNCA  All right. Mmm-mmm.
RTST  Yeah?
MNCA  [disgusted, trying not to show it] I love how it crumbles. Now see, your
chocolate doesn't do that.
MNCA  [still chewing] Mmm-mmm.
RTST  But, we're thinking, given the right marketing, we can make Thanksgiving the
Mockolate holiday.
MNCA  Wow.
RTST  Aren't you going to swallow that?
MNCA  Just waiting for it to stop bubbling.
RTST  Yeah, isn't that great?
MNCA  [with false enthusiasm] Mmm.
RTST  Well, anyhoo, um, we are looking for a couple of chefs who can create some
Thanksgiving-themed recipes. You think you might be interested?
MNCA  Abso...[swallows hard]...lutely. See, I love creating new recipes. I love
Thanksgiving. And, well, now, I love Mockolate.
RTST  Really?
MNCA  Especially the after taste, you know, I'll tell ya, that'll last ya till
Christmas.
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's apartment. Monica and Phoebe are there. Monica is
suggesting Mockolate recipes to Phoebe.]
MNCA  How about Mockolate mousse?
PHOE  It's not, it's not very Thanksgiving-y.
MNCA  Ok, how about pilgrim Mockolate mousse?
PHOE  What makes it pilgrim?
MNCA  We'll put buckles on it.
RACH  Hey.
PHOE  Hey.
MNCA  Hey.
RACH  Did uh, Ross call?
MNCA  No, I'm sorry.
RACH  Why didn't he call? He's gonna stay with Julie, isn't he? He's gonna stay with
her and she's going to be all, "Hi, I'm Julie, Ross picked me, and we're gonna to get
married, have a lot of kids and dig up stuff together."
PHOE  No offense, but that sounds nothing like her.
[Scene  Chandler and Joey's apartment. Ross is up in arms about the Rachel/Julie
situation.]
ROSS  I don't know what to do. What am I gonna do? I mean, this, this is like a
complete nightmare.
CHAN  Oh, I know. This must be so hard. Oh, no. Two women love me. They're both
gorgeous and sexy. My wallet's too small for my fifties, and my diamond shoes are too
tight.
JOEY  Hey, here's a thought, Ross. [reaches for the computer]
CHAN  Don't touch the computer. Don't ever touch the computer.
JOEY  Ross, listen. I got two words for you. Threesome.
CHAN  Ok, all right, look. Let's get logical about this, ok? We'll make a list. Rachel
and Julie, pros and cons. Oh. We'll put their names in bold, with different fonts, and I
can use different colors for each column.
ROSS  Can't we just use a pen?
CHAN  No, Amish boy.
JOEY  Ok, let's start with the cons, 'cause they're more fun. All right, Rachel first.
ROSS  I don't know. I mean, all right, I guess you can say she's a little spoiled
sometimes.
JOEY  You could say that.
ROSS  And I guess, you know, sometimes, she's a little ditzy, you know. And I've seen
her be a little too into her looks. Oh, and Julie and I, we have a lot in common 'cause
we're both paleontologists, but Rachel's just a waitress.
CHAN  Waitress. Got it. You guys wanna play Doom? Or we could keep doing this. What
else?
ROSS  I don't know.
JOEY  Oh, her ankles are a little chubby.
CHAN  Ok, let's do Julie. What's wrong with her?
ROSS  [long pause] She's not Rachel.
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's apartment. Monica has made food for Phoebe and Rachel to
taste.]
MNCA  Ok, this is pumpkin pie with mockolate cookie crumb crust. This is mockolate
cranberry cake, and these are mockolate chip cookies. Just like the Indians served.
RACH  Oh my god.
MNCA  Oh my god good?
RACH  Oh my god, I can't believe you let me put this in my mouth.
PHOE  Oh, oh sweet Lord! This is what evil must taste like!
[Scene  Chandler and Joey's apartment. Chandler is on the phone with a computer
hotline.]
CHAN  I'm telling you this thing won't print. Yes, I pressed that button like 100
times. You know, for a hot line you are not so hot. What? What is that in the background?
Are you watching Star Trek?
JOEY  [to Ross] Hey, so how'd it go with Julie? Did you, did you break her heart?
ROSS  Yes, it was horrible. She cried. I cried. She threw things, they hit me. Anyway,
I did the right thing.
CHAN  [in phone] So, Spock actually hugs his father?
RACH  Hey, do you guys have...[sees Ross, pauses]...hi.
ROSS  Hi.
RACH  [sees his coat on] Where you goin'?
ROSS  I uh, I just got back from uh, from Julie's.
RACH  [dejected] Oh.
ROSS  No, no, uh, it's not what you think. It's um the other thing.
RACH  Well, what's the other thing, what do I think?
ROSS  Well, uh.
JOEY  He broke up with Julie. Well, go hug her, for god's sakes.
RACH  Really?
ROSS  Really. It's always been you, Rach.
RACH  Oh, god.
JOEY/CHAN  Ohhh.
RACH  Oh, oh, this is good, this is really good.
ROSS  I know, I know, it's, it's almost...[turns around, sees Chandler and Joey] What
do you say we go take a walk, just us, not them?
RACH  Let me get my coat.
ROSS  Ok. No, hey, whoa, whoa, I'll get your coat.
RACH  Ok, he's goin' to get my coat. He's goin' to get my coat. Oh my god, you guys. I
can't believe this. This is unbelievable. [notices Chandler's computer screen] What's
that?
CHAN  [nervous] What? Nothing.
RACH  What's that? What? I saw my name. What is it?
CHAN  No, no, see? See? [the printer starts to run] Hey, it's printing. [to Joey,
rattled] Hey, it's printing!
RACH  Well what is it? Let me see.
ROSS  Hey, someone order a coat?
RACH  Ross, Chandler wrote something about me on his computer and he won't let me see.
ROSS  He won't? [remembers what it is] He won't! Because, isn't that, isn't that the,
the short story you were writing?
CHAN  Yes, yes it is, short story, that I was writing.
RACH  And I'm in it? Then let me read it.
CHAN, JOEY, ROSS  No!
RACH  Come on.
JOEY  Hey, uh, why don't you read it to her?
CHAN  [through gritted teeth] Alright. [clears his throat] "It was summer, and it
was hot. Rachel was there. A lonely gray couch. 'Oh, look,' cried Ned, and then the
kingdom was his forever. The end."
ROSS  That's it? That's all you wrote? You're the worst writer in the whole world.
RACH  All right, you know what? This isn't funny anymore. There's something about me on
that piece of paper and I want to see it.
ROSS  No, you don't.
RACH  All right, you know what, that's fine. If you guys want to be children about
this, that's fine. I do not need to see it. [Rachel grabs the paper and runs across the
room, reading it to herself.]
RACH  What is this? Ross, what is this?
CHAN  Good luck.
ROSS  Ok, just, just remember how crazy I am about you, ok?
RACH  Kind of ditzy? Too into her looks? Spoiled?
ROSS  Now that's a little spoiled. He was supposed to type "little", the
idiot.
RACH  Just a waitress?
ROSS  No, that, that was, I mean, as opposed to uh, the uh, ok. Is this over yet Rach?
RACH  Oh! I do not have chubby ankles!
ROSS  No, no, wait, ok, ok, look at the other side. Look at Julie's column.
RACH  She is not Rachem. What the hell's a Rachem? Is that some stupid
paleontology word that I wouldn't know because I'm just a waitress.
ROSS  No, Rach, come on. Rach! Rach, no, no! She's not Rachel, she is, she is not,
Ra--Rachel?
[Scene  Central Perk. Chandler, Monica, Joey, and Phoebe are there.]
CHAN  My diary! My diary, that's brilliant. I should have told her it was my diary, she
never would have made me read her my diary.
MNCA  You know, that's true. You'd be a great person to have around the day after an
emergency.
PHOE  I... I cannot believe Ross even made this list. What a dinkus.
JOEY  Hey, cut him some slack. It was Chandler's idea.
PHOE  What?
MNCA  What?
CHAN  Oh good, I was hoping that would come up.
MNCA  This was your idea?
PHOE  What were you thinking?
CHAN  [squirming] All right, let's get some perspective here, ok? These things, they
happen for a reason.
MNCA  Yeah. You!
CHAN  All right, Pheebs, back me up here, ok? You believe in that karma crap, don't
you?
PHOE  Yeah, by the way, good luck in your next life as a dung beetle.
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's apartment. Rachel is sitting on the couch, eating candy. It
is raining out. Ross climbs up the fire escape and is knocking on the window.]
ROSS  Rach! Whoops! Rach, hey, open up, please!
RACH  [coldly] When somebody does not buzz you in, Ross, that means go away. That
doesn't mean please climb up the fire escape.
ROSS  I just wanna read something. It's your pro list.
RACH  Not interested.
JOEY  [opens the drapes] Hey, Ross! What are you doin'?
ROSS  Hey, Joey. You wanna open the window?
JOEY  Oh, yeah, I do.
CHAN  What are you doing out there?
ROSS  I am, uh, I am...
MNCA  Oh, you must be freezing. You know what you need? How about a nice steaming cup
of hot Mockolate?
ROSS  Rach, come on, open up. Rach, come on, come on, Rach. You got to give me another
chance.
RACH  No.
ROSS  No?
RACH  That's what I said.
CHAN  Look, maybe we should go?
RACH  No, you guys, you really don't have to go, we're done talking.
ROSS  Rach, come on, look, I know how you must feel.
RACH  [near tears] No, you don't, Ross. Imagine the worst things you think about
yourself. Now, how would you feel if the one person that you trusted the most in the world
not only thinks them too, but actually uses them as reasons not to be with you.
ROSS  No, but, but I wanna be with you in spite of all those things.
RACH  Oh, well, that's, that's mighty big of you, Ross. [to the others] I said don't
go!
ROSS  You know what? You know what? If, things were the other way around, there's
nothing you could put on a list that would ever make me not want to be with you.
RACH  Well, then, I guess that's the difference between us. See, I'd never make a list.
JOEY  [quietly] I never know how long you're supposed to wait in this type of a
situation before you can talk again, you know? [Ross stares blankly at him] Maybe a little
longer.
[Scene  Mr. Ratstatter's office. Monica is there.]
MNCA  Now, in some of these recipes, the quantities may seem just a little unusual, uh,
like these coconut mockolate holiday nut bars. I've indicated four cups of coconut, and
four cups of crushed nut, and only, uh, one tablespoon of mockolate.
RTST  Doesn't matter.
MNCA  What?
RTST  Our FDA approval didn't come through. Something about laboratory rats.
MNCA  Oh, gosh, I'm sorry.
RTST  Yeah, well, anyhoo, here is your check. [hands it to her] Thank you for all the
trouble you went through. Um, listen, you didn't eat a lot of it while you were cooking,
did you?
MNCA  Well, uh, I ate some.
RTST  Oh, some, that's fine. Some is fine. Some is not a lot. So, it doesn't burn when
you pee, does it?
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's apartment. Monica and Rachel are there.]
MNCA  Hello?
ROSS  Hi.
RACH  [to Monica] Is that him again? Tell him I'd come to the phone, but my ankles are
weighin' me down.
MNCA  [to Ross] Listen, I... I don't think this is the best time.
ROSS  Look, can, can you do something for me?
MNCA  Sure, what? Ok, ok. [hangs up the phone] [to Rachel] Music?
RADIO  The next one's dedicated to Rachel from Ross. Rachel, he wants you to know he's
deeply sorry for what he did and he hopes you can find it in your heart to forgive him. (With
or Without You plays)
RADIO  Uh, we've just gotten a call from Rachel, and she told us what Ross did. It's
pretty appalling, and Ross, if you're listening, I don't wanna play your song anymore. Why
don't we devote our time to a couple that stands a chance? Avery, Michelle's sorry she hit
you with her car and she hopes you two will work it out.
[Scene  Mr. Ratstatter's office. Monica is there.]
RTST  Hi, thanks for coming in again.
MNCA  Oh, not at all. I have no morals and I need the cash.
RTST  It's like I'm lookin' in a mirror. Anyway, they're called
"fishtachios". They taste exactly like pistachios, but they're made primarily of
reconstituted fish bits. Here, try one. You're not allergic to anything, are you?
MNCA  Cat hair.
RTST  Oh, sorry.
JOEY  They're ribbed for your pleasure.

[Ross and Monica trade their gifts.]
RACH  Joey, would you slow down? They're not gonna be sold out of papers at one o'clock
in the morning.
JOEY  I'm excited! I've never gotten reviewed before.
MNCA  You were so amazing as the king. I was really impressed, I was.
PHOE  Although, you know what? You might want to consider wearing underwear next time.
Yeah, cause when you sat down on your throne you could kind of see your... royal subject.
JOEY  Here it is, here it is. [reading from newspaper] The only thing worse than the
mindless, adolescent direction was Joseph Tribbiani's disturbingly unskilled portrayal of
the king.
CHAN  OK, look, that is one guy's opinion, alright. Phoebs, read yours.
PHOE  OK. [reading] The only thing worse than the mindless, adolescent direction...
CHAN  Does anyone have one from a different paper? Ross, read yours.
ROSS  I don't want to.
RACH  Joey, honey, they don't know what they're talking about.
ROSS  Yeah.
JOEY  Maybe they do. I've been doin' this ten years and I haven't gotten anywhere.
There's gotta be a reason.
ROSS  Oh c'mon. Maybe you're just, uhhh... paying your dues.
JOEY  No, no, no, it.. it's too hard. It's not worth it. I quit.
MNCA  Wait, wait, wait, wait, wait one minute. Wait a minute. I believe this
will change your mind. [Reads from paper] In a mediocre play, Joseph Tribbiana was able
to achieve brilliant new levels of... continued on page 153...[turns it] sucking.
[Scene  Chandler, Phoebe, Rachel, Monica comforting Joey at Monica and Rachel's
apartment.]
JOEY  When I was little, I wanted to be a veteranarian, but then I found out you had to
put your hands into cows and stuff.
ROSS  [sullenly] Hiiiiii.
PHOE  Are... are you OK?
ROSS  Yeah, yeah, just a tough day at work. A stegosaurus fell over and trapped a kid.
Whoa, whoa, I know this jacket, this is, th--Fun Bobby's jacket! Where is he, what. He,
he's here, isn't he?
MNCA  Maybe.
ROSS  Don't toy with me.
FBOB  Geller!
ROSS  Hey, Fun Bobby!
FBOB  Hey. Whoa, hey, you've been working out, huh?
ROSS  Not at all! I love this guy. Hey, I was so psyched to hear you're back with my
sister!
MNCA  You and me both.
FBOB  Hey, so what'd I miss, what'd I miss, c'mon?
PHOE  Oh, we were just trying to make Joey feel better.
FBOB  Hey, do you need me to pick you up?
JOEY  No, I'm alright man. Really.
FBOB  No, I'm picking you up.
JOEY  Hey no, seriously, I don't need you to pick me... [Fun Bobby picks Joey up off
the ground, bounces him. Joey laughs.] Alright! It still works.
FBOB  OK, now before I go, does anybody else need to be picked up? [everyone raises
their hands] I'm still gonna go.
MNCA  OK, I'll see you later babe.
FBOB  Uh, public display of affection coming up. You can avert your eyes. [kisses
Monica]
FBOB  See ya. [exits]
ALL  Bye! See you later!
PHOE  Fun Bobby is so great.
MNCA  Oh, isn't he? Oh, you know, I really think this time it may work with him. I
mean, he just makes me feel so good and I've been feeling so lousy this last couple of
months, no job, no boyfriend. Well, at least my cup is half full.
PHOE  Half full of looooovvvvve.
MNCA  And for our two-week anniversary, he's gonna take me to his cousin's cabin for
the weekend.
PHOE  Cabin of loooooovvvvve.
RACH  We went through a lot of wine tonight, you guys. [walks over to table,
holding five empty wine bottles]
MNCA  Really? I only had two glasses.
JOEY  I just had a glass.
PHOE  Two.
RACH  I had one glass.
CHAN  I had about a mugful in this lovely 'I got boned at the Museum of Natural
History' mug.
RACH  OK, so that's... that's what, two bottles? And yet somehow we went through five?
ROSS  Oooooh.
JOEY  [realizing what everyone else did a minute ago] Ooooooh.
MNCA  So what. So he drank a lot tonight.
ROSS  Yeah but, you know, now that I think about it, I don't think I've ever seen Fun
Bobby without a... a drink in his hand.
PHOE  Yeah. Oh, OOOH, yeah, you know, did you notice how he always starts his stories
with, um, OK, 'I was soooo wasted,' or, 'Oh, we were soooo bombed,' or, ummm, ooh, ooh,
'So I wake up, and I'm in this dumpster in Connecticut.'
JOEY  Monica, have you ever been with him when he wasn't drinking?
MNCA  Well, we just happen to go to alot of places where you might drink. I mean, how
do you go to a wine tasting without having a drink? Or... or to a club, or to the... zoo.
[Scene  Monica, Fun Bobby, and Phoebe sitting in Central Perk Rachel is serving
them. She brings a mug to Monica.]
MNCA  Rach, does this have nonfat milk?
RACH  Ehhhummmm, I don't know, why don't you taste it.
MNCA  [takes a sip] Mmmm, no.
RACH  Oh well, too late, sorry, you already had some.
FBOB  [pulls out a flask] Whattaya say we make these, uh, coffees Irish?
PHOE  Um, cake.
RACH  Yeah, we're gonna... we're gonna get some cake. [Phoebe and Rachel go to
counter.]
MNCA  You know what? It seems like you've been making an awful lot of stuff Irish
lately.
FBOB  Well, I would make them Belgian, but the waffles are hard to get into that flask.
MNCA  Bobby.
FBOB  Yeah, OK.
MNCA  Look, maybe this is none of my business, or maybe it is, I don't know... but, uh,
I'm kind of worried about you.
FBOB  OK, look, this isn't the first time somebody's said something to me about this,
but, I don't know... I always made excuses about it, like... uhhh... 'I'm just a social
drinker,' or, 'C'mon, it's Flag Day.'
MNCA  So, what are you saying now?
FBOB  I guess I'm saying, I'll try and quit. I kinda like that you worry about me.
[they hug]
PHOE  [comes back to couch, with cake] Sooo, what's goin' on, huh?
FBOB  I am gonna try and quit drinking.
PHOE  [sad] Ooohh, why?
CHAN  Hey.
JOEY  Hey.
MNCA  Hey.
PHOE  Hey.
CHAN  Guess who's back in show business.
PHOE  Ohh, ohh, Lorne Green?
CHAN  No, no, Phoebs. You know why? Cause he's dead.
PHOE  Oh, no.
CHAN  OK, I guess this is gonna seem kinda bittersweet now, but... Joey, that's who.
JOEY  Yeah, my agent just called me with an audition for Days of Our Lives!
PHOE  Oh, well, we have to celebrate. You know what we should do? We should do, like, a
soap opera theme.
CHAN  Hey, yeah... we could all sleep together and then one of us could get amnesia.
PHOE  Hey Rach, what time do you get off? We're all gonna do something tonight.
RACH  Ummmm.... well, actually I'm already done, but I...I kinda got plans.
MNCA  [gasps] You have other friends?
RACH  Yeah... I, uhh... I have a... I have a date.
MNCA  What?
JOEY  With a man?
RACH  What? What is so strange about me having a date?
JOEY  What about Ross? I mean, are you still mad at him cause he made that list about
you?
RACH  Noooo, no, I'm not mad at him. I'm.. I'm not really anything at him
anymore.
MNCA  What are you talking about?
RACH  I don't know. Whatever I was feeling, I'm... not.
PHOE  But you guys came so close.
RACH  Oh, I know, I'm sorry you guys. You're just gonna have to get used to the fact
that I will not be dating Ross.
RACH  Here he is. Hi. Guys, this is Russ.
RUSS  [sounding like Ross] Hhhhiiiii.
[Scene  Estelle Leonard Talent Agency. Estelle (ESTL) is speaking on the phone.]
ESTL  Stop saying you're not talented, you're very talented. It's just with the bird
dead and all, there's very little act left. Oh, honey, give me a break, will ya? [a knock
on the door] Oooh, ooh, I'll talk to you later.
ESTL  Well, there's my favorite client. So tell me darling, how was the audition?
JOEY  Well, I think it went pretty well. I.. I got a callback for Thursday.
ESTL  Joey, have you ever seen me ecstatic?
JOEY  No.
ESTL  Well, here it is. [She almost smiles.]
JOEY  OK, uh.... listen, there's something I want to talk to you about. The network
casting lady...
ESTL  Oh, isn't Lori a doll?
JOEY  Oh yeah, yeah, she's great, but... I kinda got the feeling that she was sort
of... coming on to me. And I definitely would get the part if I would've... you know... if
I would have sent the Little General in.
ESTL  Oh, I see. Well, I'm just gonna put in a call here and we'll find out what's
goin' on and straighten it out. [picks up the phone] Yeah, hi, Lori please. [pause] Hi
darling. So how 'bout Joey Tribbiani for the part of the cab driver, isn't he terrific?
[pause] Uh-huuuuh. [pause] Uh-huuuuh. OK, doll. Talk to you later. [hangs up] [to Joey]
Yeah, you're gonna have to sleep with her.
[Scene  Central Perk. Monica and Rachel at counter, Phoebe, Chandler, and Fun
Bobby at the couch.]
RACH  What's the matter?
MNCA  It's Fun Bobby.
RACH  What, isn't he sober?
MNCA  Oh, he's sober alright. Just turns out that Fun Bobby was fun for a reason.
RACH  Ohhh, OK.
MNCA  Alright, here you go, sweetie. [hands Fun Bobby his coffee]
FBOB  Thanks. You wanna hear something funny?
MNCA  Oh God, yes!
FBOB  There are no hardware stores open past midnight in the Village.
PHOE  That is funny.
FBOB  I needed to buy a hammer the other night, and I'm out walkin' around the
neighborhood but apparently there are no hardware stores open past midnight in the
Village.
MNCA  Ahhh, hey honey? Don't you have to be at your interview now?
FBOB  Oh yeah. See you guys. [leaves]
CHAN  Bye..... ridiculously dull Bobby.
MNCA  Oh.... my... God.
PHOE  It's not that bad.
MNCA  Not that bad? Did you hear the hammer story?
PHOE  OK, OK, don't get all squinky.
RACH  Maybe it was just the kind of story where you have to be there.
MNCA  But I'm gonna be there... for the rest of my life. I mean, I can't break up with
him. I'm the one who made him quit drinking. He's dull because of me.
PHOE  Alright, don't say that. He's probably always been dull. You just, you know, set
it free.
RUSS  Hi.
CHAN  [turning around] Hey Ross.... bahhhh!
RACH  Hi Russ, I've just got two more tables to clean and then we'll go, OK?
RUSS  OK, I'll just sit here and... uh... chat with your, uh.... friend-type....people.
PHOE  Rachel? Um, hi.
RACH  Hi.
PHOE  OK, so, you know what you're doing, right?
RACH  Uhh.... waitressing?
PHOE  Well, yeah, but... no. I mean, umm... doesn't.... doesn't Russ just remind you of
someone?
RACH  [looks at him] Huh, Bob Saget?
PHOE  [looks at Russ] Oh, yeah! No, no, no, no, oh, oh.
PHOE  Oh, my, oh!
ROSS  What? What's wrong?
PHOE  I, OK....
MNCA  She's just upset because she, uh, she buttered a spider into her toast this
morning.
ROSS  Alright.
CHAN  [to Phoebe] Listen, Phoebs, this is gonna be OK. [introducing Russ and Ross]
Ross, Russ. Russ, Ross.
RUSS  Hi.
ROSS  Hi.
RUSS  Are you a, uh, friend of Rachel's?
ROSS  Yes, yes I am. Are you a, uh, a friend of Rachel's?
RUSS  Actually, I'm a... kind of a.... you know, a... date-type... thing... of
Rachel's.
ROSS  A date.
RUSS  Yeah, I'm her date.
ROSS  Oh, oh, you're... uh... you're, oh you're the date.
CHAN  You know, this is actually good, because if we ever lose Ross, we have a spare.
RUSS  Oh, you are the, uh... paleontologist.
ROSS  Yes, yes I am. And you are a....
RUSS  Periodontist.
MNCA  See? They're as different as night and... later that night.
ROSS  Well, I am going to, uh... get a beverage. It was nice, nice... uh... meeting
you.
RUSS  Ditto.
ROSS  I, uh, well... I... I met Russ.
RACH  Oh.
ROSS  Hey, I didn't know we were, uh, seeing other people.
RACH  Well, we're not seeing each other, so....
ROSS  Well, uh, for your information, there's a woman at the museum, who's curator of
moths and other... uh... winged things... who's, uh, let it be known that she is drawn to
me much like a... well, you know. But so far I've been keeping her at bay, but, uh, if
this is the deal...
RACH  Well, yeah, this is the deal.
ROSS  OK, well, um, have a nice evening.
RACH  Um, Russ, you ready?
RUSS  Yeah.
RACH  Bye.
MNCA  Bye.
PHOE  Bye.
ROSS  [upset] She's dating. She's dating.
CHAN  Yes, yes, but did you see who she was dating?
ROSS  What do you mean?
MNCA  Do you not see it?
ROSS  See what? I don't know what she sees in... innn that goober. And it takes him,
what? Like... like... I don't know, uhh... uhhh, hello.... a... week, to get out a
sentence.
CHAN  Yeah, it's annoying, isn't it?
ROSS  ....................Yeah.
[Scene  Chandler and Joey's apartment. Joey is making marinara sauce and filling every
container in sight. Chandler enters.]
CHAN  Hey.
JOEY  Hey.
CHAN  Whoa, whoa, so I'm guessing you didn't get the part, or... uh, Italy called and
said it was hungry.
JOEY  Well, the part's mine if I want it.
CHAN  Oh my God!
JOEY  Yeah, if I'm willing to sleep with the casting lady.
CHAN  [not knowing how to react] Oh my... God?
JOEY  Ten years I've been waiting for a break like this Chandler, ten years! I mean, Days
of Our Lives. That's actually on television.
CHAN  So, what're you gonna do?
JOEY  Well, I guess I could sleep with her... I mean, how could I do that?
CHAN  Well, I... I've got a pop-up book that told me everything I need to know.
JOEY  I've never slept with someone for a part.
CHAN  Well is she... [reaches into the cookie jar for a cookie, takes his hand out,
covered with pasta sauce]
JOEY  Sorry.
CHAN  It's alright. Is she good-looking?
JOEY  Yeah, she's totally good looking. I mean, if I met her in a bar, or something,
I'd be buying her breakfast. [pause] You know, after having slept with her.
CHAN  Y'know, maybe this isn't such a big deal. Y'know, I mean, the way that I see it
is you get a great job and you get to have sex. Y'know, I mean, throw in a tree and
a fat guy and you've got Christmas.
JOEY  I just... I just don't think that I want it that way though, y'know? I mean,
let's say I do make it, alright? I'm always gonna look back and wonder if it was because
of my talent or because of.. y'know, the Little General.
CHAN  Didn't you used to call it the Little Major?
JOEY  Yeah, but after Denise DeMarco, I had to promote it.
[Scene  A restaurant. Fun Bobby and Monica are ordering.]
WAITER  Can I get you something from the bar?
MNCA  Yes, I would like something. [looks at Fun Bobby, changes her mind] No, no thank
you.
FBOB  If... if you want to drink, it's OK with me, I've got to get used to it.
MNCA  No, no really. I.. I wouldn't feel right about it. [to waiter] Just some water.
FBOB  So the light went out in my refrigerator...
MNCA  [grabs waiter as he's leaving] I'd like a scotch on the rocks with a twist.
[Scene  Central Perk. Chandler is sitting on the couch between Russ and Ross,
doing a crossword puzzle.]
CHAN  Hey, we're having some fun now, huh, Ross? Wanna do another one, huh Russ? OK...
eleven letters, atomic element number 101... ends in ium.
RUSS  Dysprosium.
ROSS  [condescendingly] Dysprosium? Try mendelevium.
CHAN  And weenie number two has it. Unless, of course, nine-down, Knights in White
Satin was sung by the Doody Blues.
PHOE  You don't see it? You actually don't see it?
RACH  What?
PHOE  OK honey, you're dating Ross.
RACH  No, Phoebs. I'm dating Russ.
PHOE  Russ is Ross. Russ... Ross!
RACH  Steve... sleeve!
PHOE  OK, noone is named Sleeve.
RACH  Phoebe, what the hell are you talking about? Other than their names being
similar, I'm sorry, I do not see what you're seeing.
ROSS  [to Russ] For your information, it's a card sharp, not a card shark.
RUSS  You could not be more wrong. You could try... but you would not be successful.
CHAN  OK, I'm gonna get some more coffee before the pinching and eye-poking begins.
RUSS  I know what your problem is.
ROSS  Oh you do, do you?
RUSS  Um-hum, you're jealous.
ROSS  Of... of what?
RUSS  You're jealous because I'm a real doctor.
ROSS  Hey, you're a doctor of gums. That's the smallest body part you can major
in. It's like day one, floss. Day two, here's your diploma.
RUSS  Hey, you listen.
ROSS  No, no, let me finish.
RUSS  No, let me finish.
ROSS  No, you let me fini...
ROSS  Hi.
RUSS  Hi.
RACH  Ewww, ewww, ewww, ewww! [turns away]
[Scene  Ross, Phoebe, Rachel, and Chandler at Monica and Rachel's apartment.]
RACH  Did Joey say what he was gonna go when he left?
CHAN  No, I don't even think he knew. Hey, would you sleep with somebody to get a great
job?
RACH  I don't know. Who would I have to sleep with?
CHAN  Me.
RACH  Why would I have to sleep with you?
CHAN  It's my game. You want the job or not?
CHAN  Hey.
MNCA  Morning.
ROSS  Where ya goin'?
MNCA  Bobby and I are going away for the weekend, remember?
ROSS  Ooooohhhh.
PHOE  What's with all the bottles of liquor?
ROSS  What's going on, is... uh, Bobby drinking again?
MNCA  Oh no no, this is not for him, this is for me. That way he's still sober but I
find his stories about shoelaces much more amusing.
RACH  Oh God, even his knock is boring.
MNCA  Hi. I'll be ready in just a second.
FBOB  Uh, can I talk to you a minute?
MNCA  Sure.
FBOB  This is really hard for me to say.
MNCA  Oh God, you fell off the wagon.
FBOB  Oh, no, no, it's about you.
MNCA  What about me?
FBOB  I think you may have a drinking problem.
MNCA  What these? [holding up liquor bottles] Oh, these are, um, for.. cuts and
scrapes.
FBOB  Look, I am just not strong enough to be in a codependent relationship right now,
OK?
MNCA  Oh... shoot.
FBOB  Well, anyway, I hope we can be friends.
MNCA  OK.
MNCA  Take care.
FBOB  You too.
RACH  What happened?
MNCA  Well we... we kinda broke up.
GANG  Awwwwwwww.
MNCA  [holding bottles] Does anybody want these?
CHAN  I'll take one. Sometimes I like to hold stuff like this and pretend I'm a giant.
JOEY  Hey.
GANG  Hey!
ROSS  How'd the callback go?
JOEY  It was unbelievable! I walked in there and she was all over me.
CHAN  So what'd you do?
JOEY  Well, I couldn't do it. I told her I didn't want to get the part that way.
ROSS  Good for you.
JOEY  But wait, wait, wait. Then, after I left her office, she caught up with me at the
elevator and offered me an even bigger part.
PHOE  So... and?
JOEY  Soooooo... you are now looking at Dr. Drake Ramore, neurosurgeon, recurring in at
least four episodes!
GANG  Allright!
JOEY  Alright... I've got to go shower. [leaves]
Credits [Scene  Central Perk. Russ enters. Chandler and
Phoebe are sitting on the couch.]
RUSS  Hi.
CHAN  Oh, hey.
PHOE  Hi.
RUSS  I guess you guys heard, Rachel dumped me.
CHAN  Yeah, I'm sorry man.
RUSS  Oh, all she said was that I remind her too much of somebody. You have any idea
who she's talking about?
PHOE  Oh I do, it's.... it's Bob Saget. She hates him.
RUSS  Oh.
JULIE  Hey.
CHAN  Hey!
PHOE  Hey, Julie! Hey, how are you doing?
JULIE  Um, oh, I don't know. I mean, it's definitely weird not being with Ross, but I
guess I'm doing OK. Actually I've got some of his stuff that he, um....
ROSS  Ok. Here's his diaper bag, and his uh, Mr. Winky, and uh...oh, him. Hi!
CAROL  So how did everything go?
ROSS  Oh, great. Great. There was a projectile, uh, throwing up incident, but he
started it.
CAROL  Well, we've gotta go.
ROSS  Ok.
SUSAN  [clears her throat]
CAROL  Oh, right. Um, I've got some news. It's about us.
ROSS  Oh, you and me?
CAROL  Uh, no, Susan and me.
SUSAN  The other us.
ROSS  Ok.
CAROL  We're uh, we're getting married.
ROSS  As in, "I now pronounce you wife and wife" married?
CAROL  Anyway, we'd like you to come, but we totally understand if you don't want to.
ROSS  Why wouldn't I want to come? I had fun at the first wedding.
CAROL  Look I just thought that...
ROSS  No no no, I mean, hey, why shouldn't I be happy for you? What would it say about
me if I couldn't revel in your joy? I'm revelling baby, believe me!
SUSAN  Is your finger caught in that chair?
ROSS  Mmm hmmm.
CAROL  Want us to go?
ROSS  Uh-huh.
ROSS  This is so cool. You're actually gonna be on television.
JOEY  It really hit me last night. I'm gonna be on Days of our Lives. And then I
started thinkin' about all of u, and how these are the days of our lives..
MONICA  Yes! Carol and Susan's caterer had a mountain bike accident this weekend, and
she's in a full body cast.
ROSS, CHANDLER & JOEY  Yes!
MONICA  They want me to do it, which is really cool, seeing as I've never catered
before, and I really need the money, and this isn't a problem for you, is it?
ROSS  Would it matter?
MONICA  Oh, you are so great! [kisses him] Thank you!
JOEY  Are you really not going?
ROSS  I am really not going. I don't get it. They already live together, why do they
need to get married?
MONICA  They love each other, and they wanna celebrate that love with the people that
are close with them.
ROSS  If you wanna call that a reason.
CHANDLER  [singing to the tune of Mister Rogers' Neighborhood] Who's the
bitterest man in the living room, the bitterest man in the living room? Hi, neighbor.
MONICA  Ross, I thought you were over this.
ROSS  Look, that has nothing to do with this, ok? She's my ex-wife. If she were
marrying a guy, none of you'd expect me to be there.
JOEY  Hey, if she were marrying a guy, she'd be like the worst lesbian ever.
RACHEL  [entering hurriedly] Did I miss it? Did I miss it?
JOEY  No, I'm on right after this guy shoots himself.
CHANDLER  Whoa, she's pretty.
JOEY  Yeah, and she's really nice too. She taught me all about how to work the cameras,
and smell-the-fart acting.
RACHEL  I'm sorry, what?
MONICA  What?
JOEY  It's like, you got so many lines to learn so fast, that sometimes you need a
minute to remember your next one. So while you're thinkin' of it, you take this big pause
where you look all intense, you know, like this.
CHANDLER  Oh, ok.
JOEY  There's my scene, there's my scene. [Joey on tv] "Mrs. Wallace, I'm
Dr. Drake Ramoray, your sister's neurosurgeon.
MRS. WALLACE  Is she gonna be all right?
JOEY  I'm afraid the situation is much worse than we expected. Your sister is suffering
from a..subcranial hematoma. Perhaps we can discuss this over coffee.
CHANDLER  Nice!
RACHEL  That's great!
ROSS  Excellent!
CHANDLER  For a minute there I thought you were actually tryin' to smell something.
ROSS  That is so good! Do it again!
JOEY  All right, all right. "Damnit Braverman, it's right there on the
chart!"
CHANDLER  That's great. All right, I gotta get to work, I got a big dinosaur bone to
inspect.
ROSS  No no, that's me.
CHANDLER  Oh, yeah.
ROSS  Oh, hello.
PHOEBE  Oh, thanks. I couldn't uh...
ROSS  Is everything ok?
PHOEBE  Um, no, huh-uh. One of my clients died on the massage table today.
ROSS  Oh my god.
CHANDLER  That's a little more relaxed than you want them to get.
PHOEBE  Yeah, um, she was 82 years old. Her name was um, Mrs. Adelman.
MONICA  Oh, honey.
PHOEBE  Yeah, it's just so strange. I mean, she probably woke up today and thought,
"ok, I'll have some breakfast, and then I'll take a little walk, and then I'll have
my massage." Little did she know God was thinking, "Ok, but that's it." Oh,
but the weirdest thing was, ok, I was cleansing her aura when she died, and when the
spirit left her body, I don't think it went very far.
RACHEL  What do you mean?
PHOEBE  I think it went into me.
MONICA  God, this is so hard. I can't decide between lamb or duck.
CHANDLER  Well, of course, lambs are scarier. Otherwise the movie would've been called
Silence of the Ducks.
RACHEL  Ok, who ordered what?
ROSS  Oh, I believe I had the half-drunk cappuccino with the lipstick on the rim.
CHANDLER  Yes, and this with the cigarette butt in it, is that decaf?
RACHEL  Oh god.
JOEY  I can't believe you're so uptight about your mom comin'.
RACHEL  I know, but it's just it's the first time, and I just don't want her to think
that because I didn't marry Barry, that my life is total crap, you know?
PHOEBE  [Mrs. Adelman's voice] Talk about crap. Try listening to Stella Niedman
tell the story of her and Rod Steiger for the hundredth time.
JOEY  Uh, Pheebs, how long do you think this lady'll be with us?
PHOEBE  I don't know. I mean, she obviously has some kind of unfinished business. [Mrs.
Adelman's voice] Sit up!
MRS. GREEN  [entering] There she is.
RACHEL  Mom!
MRS GREEN  Sweetie! So this is where you work? Oh, it's wonderful! Is it a living room?
Is it a restaurant? Who can tell? But I guess that's the fun.
RACHEL  Pretty much.
MRS GREEN  Monica! You look gorgeous! Last time I saw you, it was eat or be eaten.
RACHEL  This is Joey, and Phoebe, and this is Chandler, and you remember Ross.
MRS GREEN  Oh hello, Ross.
ROSS  Hi, Mrs. Green. [He gets up to shake her hand, but she ignores him.]
MRS GREEN  So, what do you think of my daughter in the apron with the big job?
RACHEL  Oh Mom!
MRS GREEN  If you didn't pour the coffee, no one would have anything to drink.
CHANDLER  Believe me, sometimes that happens.
MRS GREEN  This is just so exciting. You know, I never worked. I went straight from my
father's house to the sorority house to my husband's house. I am just so proud of you.
RACHEL  Really?
MRS GREEN  Yes.
PHOEBE  I know who it is you remind me of. Evelyn Dermer. 'Course, that's before she
got the lousy face lift. Now she looks like Soupy Sales.
JOEY  Pheebs, who's Evelyn Dermer?
PHOEBE  I don't know. Who's Soupy Sales?
MRS GREEN  Oh my god, there's an unattractive nude man playing the cello.
RACHEL  Yeah, well just be glad he's not playing a smaller instrument.
MRS GREEN  [laughing] You have some life here, sweetie.
RACHEL  I know. And Mom, I realize you and Daddy were upset when I didn't marry Barry
and get the big house in the suburbs with all the security and everything, but this is
just so much better for me, you know?
MRS GREEN  I do. You didn't love Barry. And I've never seen you this happy. I look at
you and I think, oh, this is what I want.
RACHEL  For...me.
MRS GREEN  Well, not just for you.
RACHEL  Well, what do you mean?
MRS GREEN  I'm uh, considering leaving your father.
MONICA  [entering] All right. Tell me if this is too cute. Lesbian wedding,
chicken breasts.
RACHEL  Oh god. I think I'm gonna be sick.
MONICA  Why? It's not like I'm putting little nipples on them.
ROSS  And you had no idea they weren't getting along?
RACHEL  None.
JOEY  They didn't fight a lot?
RACHEL  No! They didn't even talk to each other. God, how was I supposed to know they
were having problems?
PHOEBE  [Mrs. Adelman's voice] In my day, divorce was not an option.
JOEY  Hey, look who's up.
RACHEL  I just can't believe this is happening. I mean, when I was little, everybody's
parents were getting divorced. I just figured as a grownup I wouldn't have to worry about
this.
MONICA  Is there any chance that you can look at this as flattering? I mean, she's
doing it because she wants to be more like you.
RACHEL  Well, then, you know, couldn't she have just copied my haircut?
CHANDLER  You know, it's funny when my parents got divorced, they sent me to this
shrink, and she told me that all kids have a tendency to blame themselves. But in your
case it's actually kinda true.
PHOEBE  That's him.
CHANDLER  Damn. My mail order grandfather hasn't come yet.
MR A  Phoebe?
PHOEBE  Yes, hi, Mr. Adelman. Thanks for meeting me.
MR A  Oh, that's all right, although you did cut into my busy day of sitting.
PHOEBE  Um, do you wanna sit?
MR A  Oh, no, please, I spent most of mid-morning trying to stand up. Now uh, what can
I do for you, my dear?
PHOEBE  I don't know how to say this, but I think when your wife's spirit left her
body, it um, kind of stuck around in me.
MR A  You're saying, my wife is in you?
PHOEBE  Yeah. Ok, you don't have to believe me but um, can you think of any unfinished
business she might have had, like any reason she'd be hanging around?
MR A  Well, I don't know what to tell you dear. The only thing I can think of is that
she always used to say that before she died, she wanted to see everything.
PHOEBE  Everything?
MR A  Everything.
PHOEBE  Whoa, that's a lot of stuff.
MR A  Oh, wait, I remember, she also said she wanted to sleep with me one last time.
PHOEBE  I'm sorry, there's laughing in my head.
MR A  [to Joey] Worth a shot, huh?
MRS GREEN  Look at this.
RACHEL  These are from Halloween three years ago.
MRS GREEN  Oh, look, here's Barry. Did he have to come straight from the office?
RACHEL  No, that was his costume. See, he's actually an orthodontist, but he came as a
regular dentist.
MONICA  Um, you guys, you know when I said before, "thank you, but I don't really
need your help"?
RACHEL  Actually, what I think you said was, "don't touch that, and get the hell
out of my kitchen."
MONICA  Really? Weird. Anyway, see, I planned everything really well. I planned and I
planned and I planned. It just turns out, I don't think I planned enough time to actually
do it.
RACHEL  Hey, Mon, you want some help?
MONICA  If you want.
PHOEBE  [enters] Hey. What a day. I took her everywhere. The Museum of Modern
Art, Rockefeller Center, Statue of Liberty.
RACHEL  She's still with you?
PHOEBE  Yeah. I guess she hasn't seen everything yet. I'll be right back, she has to go
to the bathroom again. [Takes Mrs. Green's chin in her hand and says, in Mrs. Adelman's
voice] Oh, such a pretty face.
MRS GREEN  This is so much fun, just the girls. You know what we should do? Does
anybody have any marijuana?
RACHEL  God!
MONICA  All right, look, nobody's smoking pot around all this food.
MRS GREEN  That's fine. I never did it. I just thought I might. So, what's new in sex?
RACHEL  Oh! What's new in sex?
MRS GREEN  The only man I've ever been with is your father.
MONICA  I'm dicing, I'm dicing, I don't hear anything.
MRS GREEN  I mean, this is no offense to your dad, sweetie, but I was thinking there
might be more.
RACHEL  Oh, I'm sorry. You know what? I cannot have this conversation with you. I mean,
god, you just come in here, and drop this bomb on me, before you even tell Daddy. What?
What do you want? Do you want my blessing?
MRS GREEN  No.
RACHEL  You want me to talk you out of it?
MRS GREEN  No.
RACHEL  Then what? What do you want?
MRS GREEN  I guess I just figured of all people you would understand this.
RACHEL  Why on earth would I understand this?
MRS GREEN  You didn't marry your Barry. I did.
RACHEL  Oh.
MONICA  All right people, we're in trouble here. We've only got 12 hours and 36 minutes
left. Move, move, move!
CHANDLER  Monica, I feel like you should have German subtitles.
MONICA  Joey, speed it up!
JOEY  I'm sorry, it's the pigs. they're reluctant to get in the blankets!
PHOEBE  Monica, how did this happen? I thought you had this all planned out.
MONICA  Do you want me to cry? Is that what you want? Do you wanna see me cry?
PHOEBE  Sir! No sir!
MONICA  [to Ross] All right, you!
ROSS  No. Look, I told you I am not a part of this thing.
MONICA  All right, look, Ross. I realize that you have issues with Carol and Susan, and
I feel for you, I do. But if you don't help me cook, I'm gonna take a bunch of those
little hot dogs, and I'm gonna create a new appetizer called "pigs in Ross". All
right, ball the melon.
CHANDLER  Hey! How come I'm stuck dicing, when he gets to ball the melon.
MONICA  Hi.
CAROL  How's it going?
MONICA  It's goin' great. Right on schedule. Got my little happy helpers.[everyone
groans]
CAROL  Fine, whatever.
ROSS  What's the matter?
CAROL  Nothing. Ok, everything. I think we're calling off the wedding.
ROSS  What?
MONICA  You're still gonna pay me, right? Or something a little less selfish.
ROSS  Carol, what's the matter? What happened?
CAROL  My parents called this afternoon to say they weren't coming.
ROSS  Oh my god.
CAROL  I mean, I knew they were having trouble with this whole thing, but they're my
parents. They're supposed to give me away and everything.
ROSS  It's ok. I'm sorry.
CAROL  And then Susan and I got in this big fight because I said maybe we should call
off the wedding, and she said we weren't doing it for them, we were doing it for us, and
if I couldn't see that, then maybe we should call off the wedding. I don't know what to
do.
ROSS  I uh can't believe I'm gonna say this, but I think Susan's right.
CAROL  You do?
ROSS  Look, do you love her? And you don't have to be too emphatic about this.
CAROL  Of course I do.
ROSS  Well then that's it. And if George and Adelaide can't accept that, then the hell
with them. Look, if my parents didn't want me to marry you, no way that would have stopped
me. Look, this is your wedding. Do it.
CAROL  You're right. Of course you're right.
MONICA  So we're back on?
CAROL  We're back on.
MONICA  You heard the woman. Peel, chop, devil! I can't believe I lost 2 minutes.
JOEY  It just seems so futile, you know ? All these women, and nothing. I feel like
Superman without my powers, you know? I have the cape, and yet I cannot fly.
CHANDLER  Well now you understand how I feel every single day, ok? The world is my
lesbian wedding.
PHOEBE  [Mrs. Adelman's voice] Butterscotch? No one? All right, you'll be sorry
later.
CAROL  Thank you.
ROSS  Any time. [He doesn't want to let her go]
CAROL  Ross. [He lets her go]
MINISTER  You know, nothing makes God happier than when two people, any two people,
come together in love. Friends, family, we're gathered here today to join Carol and Susan
in holy matrimony.
PHOEBE  [Mrs. Adelman's voice] Oh my god. Now I've seen everything! [Phoebe's
voice] Whoa, she's gone. She's gone. She's gone! Go ahead, get married. Go, go.
MONICA  Would you look at them?
ROSS  Yeah, can't help but.
JOEY  [to a wedding guest] How's that pig-in-the-blanket workin' out for you? [the
guy nods] I wrapped those bad boys.
PHOEBE  I miss Rose.
CHANDLER  Oh, yeah?
PHOEBE  I know it's kind of weird, but I mean, she was a big part of my life there, you
know, and now I just feel kind of alone.
WOMAN  You know, I uh, I couldn't help but overhear what you just said, and I think
it's time for you to forget about Rose, move on with your life...how 'bout we go get you a
drink?
PHOEBE  Ok, that's so nice.
CHANDLER  [to an attractive woman] I shouldn't even bother coming up with a
line, right? [The woman walks away]
RACHEL  Hey, Mom? Having fun?
MRS GREEN  Oh, am I! I just danced with a wonderfully large woman. And three other
girls made eyes at me over the buffet. Oh, I'm not saying it's something I wanna pursue,
but it's nice to know I have options.
RACHEL  There's more alcohol, right?
SUSAN  How you doin'?
ROSS  Ok.
SUSAN  You did a good thing today.
ROSS  Yeah.
SUSAN  You wanna dance?
ROSS  No, that's fine.
SUSAN  Come on. I'll let you lead.
ROSS  Ok.
CHANDLER  [to the woman who just rejected him] All right look. Penis schmenis.
We're all people. [She walks away again.]
MONICA  Ok, which one of us do you think is gonna be the first one to get married?
ROSS  Well, Mon, I was married.
PHOEBE  Yeah, me, too, technically.
RACHEL  I had a wedding.
MONICA  All right, just trying to start an interesting discussion.
JOEY  I got one. Which one of us do you think will be the last to get married? [They
all look at Chandler]
CHANDLER  Isn't Ben in this?
ALL  Oh, yeah!
[Scene  Joey's new apartment. Everyone but Chandler is there. Joey has
decorated the place with tons of tacky stuff.]
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's apartment. Everyone except Ross is there
watching Days of Our Lives.]
[Scene  Chandler's bedroom. Chandler is sleeping and Eddie is there
watching him.]
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's apartment. Phoebe enters to see Monica,
Richard, Ross, and Rachel tearfully watching TV.]
[Scene  Monica and Rachel's apartment. Everyone is there. Monica is
watching stock prices on a business channel.]
[Scene  Moondance Diner. Ross, Phoebe, Joey, and Chandler are sitting at
the counter, Monica is working. Monica is wearing her costume, including big fake
breasts.]
[Scene  Central Perk. Rachel, Monica, Joey, and Chandler are there.]
